Risk scoring system and predictor for clinically relevant pancreatic fistula after pancreaticoduodenectomy.To establish a scoring system to predict clinically relevant postoperative pancreatic fistula (CR-POPF) after pancreaticoduodenectomy (PD).The clinical records of 921 consecutive patients who underwent PD between 2008 and 2013 were reviewed retrospectively. Postoperative pancreatic fistula (POPF) was defined and classified by the international study group of pancreatic fistula (ISGPF). We used a logistic regression model to determine the independent risk factors of CR-POPF and developed a scoring system based on the regression coefficient of the logistic regression model. The optimal cut-off value to divide the risk strata was determined by the Youden index. The patients were divided into two groups (low risk and high risk). The independent sample t test was used to detect differences in the means of drain amylase on postoperative day (POD) 1, 2 and 3. The optimal cut-off level of the drain amylase to distinguish CR-POPF from non-clinical POPF in the two risk strata groups was determined using the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves.Grade A POPF occurred in 106 (11.5%) patients, grade B occurred in 57 (6.2%) patients, and grade C occurred in 32 (3.5%) patients. A predictive scoring system for CR-POPF (0-6 points) was constructed using the following four factors: 1 point for each body mass index ≥ 28 [odds ratio (OR) = 3.86; 95% confidence interval (CI): 1.92-7.75, P = 0.00], soft gland texture (OR = 4.50; 95%CI, 2.53-7.98, P = 0.00), and the difference between the blood loss and transfusion in operation ≥ 800 mL (OR = 3.45; 95%CI, 1.92-7.75, P = 0.00); and from 0 points for a 5 mm or greater duct diameter to 3 points for a less than 2 mm duct (OR = 8.97; 95%CI: 3.70-21.77, P = 0.00). The ROC curve showed that the area under the curve of this score was 0.812. A score of 3 points was suggested to be the best cut-off value (Youden index = 0.485). In the low risk group, a drain amylase level ≥ 3600 U/L on POD3 could distinguish CR-POPF from non-clinical POPF (the sensitivity and specificity were 75% and 85%, respectively). In the high risk group, the best cut-off was a drain amylase level of 1600 (the sensitivity and specificity were 77 and 63%, respectively).A 6-point scoring system accurately predicted the occurrence of CR-POPF. In addition, a drain amylase level on POD3 might be a predictor of this complication.Persisting ratio of total amylase output in drain fluid can predict postoperative clinical pancreatic fistula.A consistent predictor for pancreatic fistula (PF) development in the early period after pancreatic resection is still lacking.A total of 54 consecutive patients undergoing pancreatic resection were enrolled between June 2007 and April 2010. Pancreaticoduodenectomy (PD) and distal pancreatectomy (DP) were performed in 38 and 16 patients, respectively. For the purpose of finding an early predictor for PF development, we investigated drain amylase levels (d-Amy, IU/mL), drain output volume (d-Vol, mL/day) and drain amylase output (Amy-V, IU/day) on postoperative days (POD) 1 and 3. Amy-V was calculated as the product of d-Amy and d-Vol, and was expressed as the sum of values obtained from all drains. In addition, the ratio of d-Amy or Amy-V on POD3 to that on POD1 was calculated as the persisting ratio in each patient.The overall incidence of clinical PF (International Study Group on Pancreatic Fistula Grade B and C) was 16.7%, occurring in 13.1% after PD and 25% after DP. All PF occurred in cases with a remnant pancreas of soft texture. There was no significant difference in d-Amy, d-Vol, or Amy-V on POD1 and POD3 between patients with and without clinical PF. The persisting ratio of Amy-V was significantly lower in patients without clinical PF compared to those with clinical PF (p = 0.029). Furthermore, the persisting ratio of Amy-V was significantly lower in patients with Grade A PF compared to those with Grade B PF (p = 0.03).The persisting ratio of drain amylase output is a new significant predictive factor for clinical PF development.Is routine imaging necessary after pancreatic resection? An appraisal of postoperative ultrasonography for the detection of pancreatic fistula.This study aimed to assess whether routine transabdominal ultrasonography (US) is clinically helpful for the early detection of postoperative pancreatic fistula (PF).In a prospective cohort of patients undergoing partial pancreatectomy, US was performed on postoperative day (POD) 3. Potential predictors of PF, including amylase value in drains (AVD) on POD 1, were investigated. A tree-based classification model of the independent predictors of PF was also performed.One hundred seventy-three patients were analyzed. A peripancreatic collection on US and an AVD 5000 U/L or greater on POD 1 were predictors of PF. In the tree-based classification model, patients were stratified by AVD on POD 1. For values less than 5000 U/L (incidence of PF, 11.3%), US had a sensitivity of 23.1% and a specificity of 97.5%. For AVD 5000 U/L or greater (incidence of PF, 70.7%), sensitivity was 46.3% and specificity was 100%.Despite the presence of a peripancreatic collection as a predictor of PF, US-as a diagnostic test-resulted to be highly specific but poorly sensitive even in the tree-based classification model. Therefore, its role does not seem to be clinically relevant and does not add value to AVD on POD 1, which remains the most powerful and relevant early predictor of PF.Risk factors of pancreatic fistula after pancreaticoduodenectomy - patients with low drain amylase level on postoperative day 1 are safe from developing pancreatic fistula.Based on the criteria of International Study Group on Pancreatic Fistula (ISGPF), the risk factors for grade B/C pancreatic fistula (PF) after pancreaticoduodenectomy (PD) were analyzed in this study.Between October 2006 and August 2010, 114 consecutive patients underwent PD at National Hospital Organization Osaka National Hospital. We compared the clinicopathological features between patients with grade B/C PF and those with PF-free/grade A PF. We also examined the relationship between PF formation and the drain amylase level on post-operative day (POD) 1 and POD 3.Eighteen patients (15.8%) developed grade B/C P. Of these patients, four patients underwent reoperation. The mortality rate in patients with grade B/C PF was 5.6%(1/18). The non-dilated pancreatic duct (≤ 3mm) was the only independent risk factor for grade B/C PF by a multivariate analysis (p=0.026). There were 45 patients who showed low (≤ three times serum amylase level)drain amylase level on POD 1 and none of them developed PF.Although our study demonstrated that the non-dilated pancreatic duct is significantly correlated with the increased incidence of grade B/CPE patients with low amylase level of drainage fluid on POD 1 are thought to be safe from developing PE.Pancreatic anastomotic leakage after pancreaticoduodenectomy. Risk factors, clinical predictors, and management (single center experience).Postoperative pancreatic fistula (POPF) after pancreaticoduodenectomy (PD) remains a challenge even at high-volume centers.This study was designed to analyze perioperative risk factors for POPF after PD and evaluate the factors that predict the extent and severity of leak. Demographic data, preoperative, intraoperative, and postoperative variables were collected.A total of 471 consecutive patients underwent PD in our center. Fifty-seven patients (12.1 %) developed a POPF of any type; 21 patients (4.5 %) had a fistula type A, 22 patients (4.7 %) had a fistula type B, and the remaining 14 patients (3 %) had a POPF type C. Cirrhotic liver (P = 0.05), BMI > 25 kg/m(2) (P = 0.0001), soft pancreas (P = 0.04), pancreatic duct diameter <3 mm (0.0001), pancreatic duct located <3 mm from the posterior border (P = 0.02) were significantly associated with POPF. With the multivariate analysis, both BMI and pancreatic duct diameter were demonstrated to be independent factors. The hospital mortality in this series was 11 patients (2.3 %), and the development of POPF type C was associated with a significantly increased mortality (7/14 patients). The following factors were predictors of clinically evident POPF: a postoperative day (POD) 1 and 5 drain amylase level >4,000 IU/L, WBC, pancreatic duct diameter <3 mm, and pancreatic texture.Cirrhotic liver, BMI, soft pancreas, pancreatic duct diameter <3 mm, pancreatic duct near the posterior border are risk factors for development of POPF. In addition a drain amylase level >4,000 IU/L on POD 1 and 5, WBC, pancreatic duct diameter, pancreatic texture may be predictors of POPF B, C.Drain amylase value as an early predictor of pancreatic fistula after cephalic duodenopancreatectomy.To determine predictors of clinically relevant pancreatic fistulas (CRPF) by measuring drain fluid amylase (DFA) in the early postoperative period.This prospective clinical study included 382 patients with periampullary tumors that were surgically resected at our department between March 2005 and October 2012. A cephalic duodenopancreatectomy (DP) was performed on all patients. Two closed suction drains were placed at the end of the surgery. The highest postoperative DFA value was recorded and analyzed during the first three postoperative days and on subsequent days if the drains were kept longer. Pancreatic fistula (PF) was classified according to the International Study Group of Pancreatic Fistula (ISGPF) criteria. Postoperative complications were defined according to the Dindo-Clavien classification. All data were statistically analyzed. The optimal thresholds of DFA levels on the first, second and third postoperative days were estimated by constructing receiver operating curves, generated by calculating the sensitivities and specificities of the DFA levels. The DFA level limits were used to differentiate between the group without PF and the groups with biochemical pancreatic fistula (BPF) and CRPF.Pylorus-preserving duodenopancreatectomy was performed on 289 (75.6%) patients, while the remaining patients underwent a classic Whipple procedure (CW). The total incidence of PF was 37.7% (grade A 22.8%, grade B 11.0% and grade C 3.9%). Soft pancreatic texture (SPT) was present in 58.3% of patients who developed PF. Mortality was 4.2%. The median DFA value on the first postoperative day (DFA1) in patients who developed PF was 4520 U/L (range 350-99000 U/L) for grade A fistula (BPF) with a SPT and a diameter of the main pancreatic duct (MPD) of ≤ 3 mm. For grade B/C (CRPF), the median DFA1 value was 8501 U/L (range 377-92060 U/L) with a SPT and MPD of ≤ 3 mm. These values were significantly higher when compared to the patients who did not have PF (122; range 5-37875 U/L). The upper limit of DFA values for the first 3 postoperative days in the examined stages of PF were: DFA1 1200 U/L for the BPF and CRPF; DFA3 350 U/L for BPF and DFA3 800 U/L for CRPF. The determined values were highly significant and demonstrated a reliable diagnostic test for both BPF and CRPF.DFA1 ≥ 1200 U/L is an important predictive factor for PF of any degree. The trend of DFA3 (decrease of < 50%) compared to DFA1 is a significant factor in the differentiation of CRPF from transient BPF.Clinically relevant pancreas-related infectious complication after pancreaticoenteral anastomosis could be predicted by the parameters obtained on postoperative day 3.Pancreatic fistula or pancreas-related infectious complications are one of the most common surgical complications after pancreatic surgery. The aims of this study were, first, to reveal the risk factors for clinically relevant pancreas-related infectious complications and, second, to identify those risk factors that are obtainable within the first 3 postoperative days.One hundred seven consecutive patients who underwent pancreaticoenteral anastomosis between October 2007 and November 2010 were enrolled.There were 36 patients with clinical pancreas-related infectious complications among 107 in this series of patients. Univariate and multivariate analyses revealed that a narrow main pancreatic duct diameter (<3 mm) was an independent risk factor for clinically relevant pancreas-related infectious complication. Univariate and multivariate analyses also revealed that a body temperature of 38°C or higher on postoperative day 3 (POD3), a leukocyte count of 9.8 × 10(9)/L or greater on POD3, and a drain fluid amylase level of 3000 IU/L or higher on POD3 were significant predictive factors for clinically relevant pancreas-related infectious complication for 58 patients with a narrow main pancreatic duct.In view of the clinical variables obtained on POD3, such as amylase levels in drain effluent, body temperature, and leukocyte count, clinically relevant pancreas-related infections could be predicted well.Does drainage fluid amylase reflect pancreatic leakage after pancreaticoduodenectomy?This study tried to determine if drainage fluid amylase reflects pancreatic leakage after pancreaticoduodenectomy and to determine the factors affecting the drainage amylase level. Patients undergoing pancreaticoduodenectomy were recruited. The drainage amylase was measured from postoperative day (POD) 1 to POD 7. Direct evidence of pancreatic leakage was provided by upper gastrointestinal studies using a water-soluble contrast medium and methylene blue dye in the pancreaticogastrostomy group or by pancreaticography with injected contrast medium via an exteriorized pancreatic stent in the pancreaticojejunostomy group on POD 7. A total of 37 patients were recruited. The drainage amylase level was higher than the normal serum amylase (>or= 190 U/L) in more than half of the cases on the initial POD 2 specimen, with a median of 745 U/L on POD 1 and 663 U/L on POD 2. The drainage amylase level was more than three times the normal serum amylase level (>or= 190 x 3 U/L) in 56.8% on POD 1, in 51.4% on POD 2, and in nearly one-third on POD 7 (29.7%). However, no pancreatic leakage occurred in any of the patients with a drainage amylase of >or= 190 U/L. Only one case of pancreatic leakage with a small amount of drainage fluid (10 ml) and low amylase level (74 U/L), was noted. Soft pancreatic parenchyma and a nondilated pancreatic duct were significantly associated with higher drainage amylase levels. In conclusion, biochemical leakage defined by amylase-rich drainage fluid might have no clinical significance and was not necessarily clinical pancreatic leakage following pancreaticoduodenectomy.[Analysis of the drainage fluid after cephalic duodenopancreatectomy: a reliable clinical criterion].The authors have retrospectively analysed the drainage fluid of 39 patients undergoing Whipple's operation over a 18-year period. The aim of the study was to assess whether the volume and amylase concentration of the drainage fluid were good criteria of healing of the pancreatico-jejunal anastomosis. The patients have been divided into two groups: Group I (30 patients) with no complications at the pancreatico-jejunostomy--Group II (9 patients) with a pancreatic leak. The analysis of the volume, amylase concentration and amylase index (Log of the amylase concentration x volume) showed that the groups had clearly different profiles: in group I all three criteria were rapidly decreasing, while they remained abnormally high in group II. Those criteria may help the clinician in the monitoring of individual patients; they also may prove useful in prospective studies evaluating new means of prevention of this anastomosis.Diagnosis of postoperative pancreatic fistula.Pancreatic fistula (PF) is a major source of morbidity after pancreatectomy. The International Study Group on Pancreatic Fistula (ISGPF) defines postoperative fistula by an amylase concentration in the abdominal drain of more than three times the serum value on day 3 or more after surgery. However, this definition fails to identify some clinical fistulas. This study examined the association between lipase measured in abdominal drainage fluid and PF.Amylase and lipase levels in the abdominal drain were measured 3 days after pancreatic resection. Grade B and C fistulas were classified as clinical fistulas, regardless of whether the measured amylase concentration was considered positive or negative. The PF group included patients with a clinical fistula and/or those with positive amylase according to the ISGPF definition.Sixty-five patients were included. The median level of lipase was higher in patients with positive amylase than in those with negative amylase: 12,176 versus 64 units/l (P < 0·001). The lipase level was 16,500 units/l in patients with a clinical fistula and 224 units/l in those without a clinical fistula (P = 0·001). Patients with a PF had a higher lipase concentration than those without: 7852 versus 64 units/l (P < 0·001). A lipase level higher than 500 units/l yielded a sensitivity of 88 per cent and a specificity of 75 per cent for PF. For clinical fistulas the sensitivity was 93 per cent and specificity 77 per cent when the threshold for lipase was 1000 units/l.Lipase concentration in the abdominal drain correlated with PF. A threshold of 1000 units/l yielded a high sensitivity and specificity for the diagnosis of clinical PF.The usefulness of drain data to identify a clinically relevant pancreatic anastomotic leak after pancreaticoduodenectomy?Pancreatic anastomotic leak (leak) remains a persistent problem after pancreaticoduodenectomy (PD). Recent reports indicate a mean occurrence of 10% with a range of 2%-28% of patients. However, valid comparisons for these studies cannot be made because the definition of leak is variable, and many patients deemed to have a leak are not sick. The aim of this study was to determine the meaning of the volume and amylase content of the effluent from surgical drains by comparing these values to actual clinical outcomes. From January 1996 to July 2002, 207 consecutive patients underwent PD. We considered a leak to be present if greater than 30 ml/day of drainage was observed from drains and if that drainage contained an amylase-rich fluid (greater than 5X serum) on or after postoperative day (POD) 5. Cases were then divided into three groups-no leak, chemical leak only (leak but asymptomatic), and a clinical leak group (leak that required therapeutic intervention, reoperation, readmission, or prolonged length of stay). Then the drainage volume and its amylase concentration for every postoperative day were compared between the three groups. There were no operative or hospital deaths, and the mean length of stay (LOS) was 11.2 +/- 6.1 days. Prolonged LOS was set at greater than 17 days (one standard deviation beyond the mean LOS for all cases). Leak was observed in 14% of cases (n = 29) and the patients were subsequently divided into these groups: no leak (n = 178), chemical leak only (n = 12), and clinical leak (n = 17). Surprisingly, the daily drain amylase values did not differ between the chemical leak group and the clinical leak group. The daily volume of drainage on POD 5-8 for the clinical leak group was significantly greater than the volumes of the other two groups, so that a combination of greater than 200 ml/day of drainage on POD 5 with an amylase greater than 5X serum had a positive predictive value (PPV) of 84% and a negative predictive value (NPV) of 99% for a clinically relevant leak. We used broad criteria from drainage effluent to include as many potential leaks as possible. This broad definition of leak selected 14% of the PD patients as having a leak; within this group, all of the clinical complications of leak occurred. By increasing the volume criteria from greater than 30 ml per day to greater than 200 ml per day, the PPV was increased from 59% to 84% while keeping NPV at 99%. Drain data based on the volume and amylase criteria of this study may be useful for early detection of a leak that will have clinical impact. This study's criteria for leak may be a good definition to design a clinical trial.Early Drain Removal--The Middle Ground Between the Drain Versus No Drain Debate in Patients Undergoing Pancreaticoduodenectomy: A Prospective Validation Study.To perform an unbiased assessment of first postoperative day (POD 1) drain amylase level and pancreatic fistula (PF) after pancreaticoduodenectomy (PD).Recent evidence demonstrated that drain abandonment in PD is unsafe. Early drain amylase levels have been proposed as predictors of PF after PD, allowing for selection of patients for early drain removal.Daily drain amylase levels were correlated with the development of PF in 2 independent cohorts of patients undergoing PD: training cohort (n = 126; year 2008) and validation cohort (n = 369; years 2009-2012).POD 1 drain amylase level had the highest predictive ability (concordance index: 0.911) for PF in the training cohort. An amylase level of 612 U/L or higher showed the best accuracy (86%), sensitivity (93%), and specificity (79%). Thus, a cutoff value of 600 U/L was utilized. In the validation cohort, 229 (62.1%) patients had a POD 1 drain amylase level of lower than 600 U/L, and PF developed in only 2 (0.9%) cases; whereas in patients with POD 1 drain amylase level of 600 U/L or higher (n = 140) the PF rate was 31.4% (odds ratio [OR] = 52, P < 0.0001). On multivariate analysis, POD 1 drain amylase level of lower than 600 U/L (OR = 0.0192, P < 0.0001) was a stronger predictor of the absence of PF than pancreatic gland texture (OR = 0.193, P = 0.002) and duct diameter (OR = 0.861, P = 0.835).After PD, the risk of PF is less than 1% if POD 1 drain amylase level is lower than 600 U/L. We propose that in this group, which comprise more than 60% of patients, drains should be removed on POD 1.A simple algorithm for drain management after pancreaticoduodenectomy.Pancreatic fistula (PF) continues to be the Achilles' heel of pancreaticoduodenectomy (PD) with both morbidity and mortality linked to its occurrence. The optimal drain management strategy after PD remains unclear. We evaluated drain amylase (DA) levels on postoperative Day (POD) 0 to 5 in 76 consecutive patients undergoing PD to determine the patterns associated with PF. Of these 76 patients, eight patients (11%) developed Grade A, B, or C PF by International Study Group of Pancreatic Fistula criteria. POD 1 DA levels correlated closely with PF rates when high (greater than 5000 U/L, 100% PF rate) and low (less than 100 U/L, 2% PF rate). In patients with intermediate POD 1 DA (100 to 5000 U/L), 42 and 74 per cent had low DA levels on POD 3 and 5, respectively, and the PF rate was four of 31 (13%). Overall, the temporal pattern of decreasing DA levels after PD correlates closely with the risk of PF, and only two patients (5%) developed PF after early DA levels had normalized. Based on these data, we propose an algorithm of monitoring DA daily with drain removal when the level is less than 100 U/L. In our patient group drain removal would have occurred on a mean of 1.8 days and median 1 day after surgery.Options and limitations in applying the fistula classification by the International Study Group for Pancreatic Fistula.Because of its retrospective character, the classification system of the International Study Group of Pancreatic Fistula (ISGPF) lacks prognostic capacity regarding fistula-related complications. This study aimed to evaluate the options and limitations of the ISGPF classification system and to identify risk factors with respect to clinical decision making.Between 1992 and 2009, 1966 patients underwent surgery of the pancreas. All patient data were entered into a prospective clinical data management system.After surgery, 276 patients (14%) developed postoperative pancreatic fistula (POPF). ISGPF type A fistula was seen in 69 patients (25%), type B in 110 (39.9%), and type C in 97 (34.1%). Solely due to their death, 16 patients had to be classified as type C fistula, even though they suffered only type A or B. Compared to genuine C fistulas, we were not able to detect any significant predictors, which may allow to distinguish the development in their further clinical course. The level of drainage amylase is of no use, whereas univariate analysis identified underlying disease, type of operation, and high levels of serum amylase or bilirubin on the day of onset of POPF to be prognostic parameters for reoperation. Multivariate analysis found elevated serum C-reactive protein to be an independent factor for increased in-hospital mortality.The ISGPF classification system has its limitations in clinical decision making, because it does not adequately describe a large subgroup of patients. To improve clinical decision making about management of patients, it is crucial that the ISGPF classification system is merged with newer clinical data.Implementation of an Enhanced Recovery Pathway After Pancreaticoduodenectomy in Patients with Low Drain Fluid Amylase.The safety and feasibility of an enhanced recovery pathway (ERP) after pancreatic surgery is largely unknown. Our aim was to prospectively evaluate a targeted ERP after pancreaticoduodenectomy (PD), using first postoperative day (POD) drain fluid amylase (DFA1) values to identify patients at low risk of pancreatic fistula (PF).Non-randomized cohort study of 130 consecutive patients. Perioperative outcomes were compared before (pre-ERP; N=65) and after (post-ERP; N=65) implementation of an ERP. Patients in each group were stratified according to the risk of PF using DFA1<350 IU/l. Low-risk patients in the post-ERP group were selected for early oral intake and early drain removal.81/130 patients had a DFA1<350. Incidence of PF was significantly lower in low-risk patients (9 vs. 45%, P=0.0001). In low-risk patients, morbidity (43 vs. 36%) and mortality (2.7 vs. 4.5%) were similar for both pre- and post-ERP patients. Hospital stay (median 9 vs. 7 days, P=0.03) and 30-day readmissions (17 vs. 2%, P=0.04) were lower in low-risk patients in the post-ERP group. In high-risk patients, there was no difference in outcomes between pre- and post-ERP.Patients at low risk of PF after PD can be identified by first POD DFA1. Enhanced recovery after PD is safe and leads to improved short-term outcomes in low-risk patients.Prediction of pancreatic fistula by amylase levels of drainage fluid on the first day after pancreatectomy.We investigated whether it would be useful to monitor amylase levels of drainage fluid after pancreatic surgery for prediction of pancreatic fistula.Twenty-six cases in which amylase levels of drainage fluid were determined after pancreatic surgery, were divided into 14 cases who did not develop pancreatic fistula and 12 cases who developed pancreatic fistula. Changes in amylase levels of sera and urine as well as drainage fluid were monitored.Amylase levels of drainage fluid were significantly higher in cases with pancreatic fistula than in cases without pancreatic fistula on the first postoperative day, but those levels in both groups decreased until the 7th postoperative day without significant difference. However, those levels in cases with pancreatic fistula significantly increased from the 9th postoperative day whereas the levels in cases without pancreatic fistula further decreased. There was no significant difference in amylase levels of sera or urine.Amylase levels of drainage fluid on the first postoperative day may be useful to predict development of pancreatic fistula and to plan appropriate management.Pancreatoduodenectomy: role of drain fluid analysis in the management of pancreatic fistula.Pancreatic fistula remains an important cause of death following pancreatoduodenectomy. There is still uncertainty regarding the use of drains following pancreatoduodenectomy with recent reports suggesting that it might be harmful with increased complications. We evaluated the use of drain fluid analysis in the management of patients following pancreatoduodenectomy.A prospective study was conducted on all patients undergoing pancreatoduodenectomy at two hospitals between April 2004 and August 2006. Drain fluid analysis was carried out from day 3 to day 5. These data were collected with the clinical pictures of the patients and with subsequent radiological assessment.Fifty consecutive patients underwent modified extended pancreatoduodenectomy for a periampullary tumour. In patients with no clinical evidence of a fistula, the mean postoperative drain fluid amylase levels were as follows: on postoperative day 3 it was 262 U/mL (standard error of mean 69), on postoperative day 4 it was 112 U/mL (standard error of mean 47) and on postoperative day 5 it was 125 U/mL (standard error of mean 64). Only three (6/6, 50%) of these patients had clinical features suggestive of a leak and were found to have a pancreatic fistula on subsequent imaging. There was no correlation between the total or mean volumes of drainage and development of a pancreatic fistula.The drain fluid analysis did not provide additional information that was not already evident from the clinical picture of the patient. Drain fluid analysis had no effect on patients with a biochemical leak only. Patients who had a significant disruption of their pancreatic anastamosis did not need biochemical analysis as the character, that is, turbidity of the drain fluid was an equally reliable indicator of the underlying pathology.Negative predictive value of drain amylase concentration for development of pancreatic fistula after pancreaticoduodenectomy.Post-operative pancreatic fistula (POPF) is the major source of morbidity following pancreaticoduodenectomy. A predictive indicator would be highly advantageous. One potential marker is drain amylase concentration (DAC). However, its predictive value has not been fully established.405 patients undergoing pancreaticoduodenectomy at our centre over a 10 year period were reviewed to determine the value of DAC as a predictive indicator for the development of POPF.POPF developed in 58 patients (14%). These patients suffered greater morbidity. Overall 30-day mortality was 1.5%. Male gender (OR: 5.1; p = 0.0082) and age > 70 (OR 2; p = 0.0372) were independent risk factors for POPF, whilst Type 2 diabetes (OR: 0.2321; p = 0.0090) and pancreatic ductal-adenocarcinoma (OR: 0.3721; p = 0.0039) decreased POPF risk. The DACs post-operatively were significantly higher in those developing POPF, but with significant overlap. ROC curves revealed optimal threshold values for differentiating POPF and non-POPF patients. A DAC°<°1400 U/ml on day 1 and <768 U/ml on day 2, although having a poor positive predictive value (32-44%), had a very strong negative predictive value (97-99%).Our data suggest that post-operative DAC below the determined optimal threshold values on day 1 and 2 following pancreaticoduodenectomy carries high negative predictive value for POPF development and identifies patients in whom early drain removal, and enhanced recovery may be considered, with simultaneous assessment of operative and clinical factors.Indicators of complications and drain removal after pancreatoduodenectomy.Significance and timing of drain removal after pancreatic surgery remain unclear. The aim of this study was to identify optimal indicators to predict severe intra-abdominal complications and determine the appropriate timing of prophylactic drain removal after pancreatoduodenectomy.This study included 151 consecutive patients who underwent pancreatoduodenectomy. We investigated associations between postoperative intra-abdominal complications, drain amylase levels, and duration of postoperative inflammatory response.Patients who developed severe intra-abdominal complications showed re-elevation of drain amylase levels after postoperative d 3 and prolonged postoperative inflammatory response, which were most pronounced in patients with severe pancreatic fistula and intra-abdominal abscess, respectively. In contrast, patients with a steady decline in drain amylase levels and short-term postoperative inflammatory response did not develop severe complications, and safe drain removal was possible even when the drain amylase value was more than three times the upper limit of normal serum amylase.A combination of trends in the drain amylase level and duration of the inflammatory response in the postoperative period may be optimal indicators for early detection of severe intra-abdominal complications and appropriate timing of drain removal.Pancreatic juice output and amylase level in the drainage fluid after pancreatoduodenectomy in relation to leakage.The objective of this study was to clarify the relationship between the consistency of the pancreas and pancreatic anastomotic leakage after pancreatectomy.Sixty-two patients who underwent proximal pancreatectomy with pancreaticoenterostomy were reviewed with regard to the consistency of the pancreas, size of the main pancreatic duct, postoperative pancreatic juice output, and pancreatic leakage after partial pancreatoduodenectomy. The pancreatic parenchyma was classified as having soft, intermediate and hard consistency (group 1, 2 and 3, respectively). Monitoring the output of pancreatic juice and amylase level in the drainage fluid after operation for the purpose of detecting of dehiscence of pancreaticoenterostomy.The mean pancreatic juice output during a period of 10 days (postoperative days 5 to 14) was 2446 +/- 27 cc in group 1 (n = 26), 846 +/- 13.5 cc in group 2 (n = 19) and 460 +/- 8.1 cc in group 3 (n = 17). Anastomotic leakage occurred in four (15%) patients in group 1, three (15%) in group 2, and none in group 3. In patients with leakage, abrupt decrease or fluctuating output of pancreatic juice occurred and amylase level in the drainage fluid was more than 10,000 IU/L POD 7.Patients with a pancreatic parenchyma with an intermediate or normal consistency produced more pancreatic juice and had a higher leak rate. Monitoring the output of pancreatic juice and amylase level in the drainage fluid after operation may provide a clue to the detection of dehiscence of pancreaticoenterostomy.Postoperative drain amylase predicts pancreatic fistula in pancreatic surgery: A systematic review and meta-analysis.This study to evaluate the utility of drain fluid amylase as a predictor of PF in patients undergoing pancreatic surgery based on the International Study Group of Pancreatic Fistula definitions of pancreatic fistula.A comprehensive search was carried out using Pubmed (Medline), Embase, Web of science and Cochrane database for clinical trials, which studied DFA as a diagnostic marker for pancreatic fistula after pancreatic surgery. Sensitivity, specificity and the diagnostic odds ratios with 95% confidence interval were calculated for each study. Summary receiver-operating curves were conducted and the area under the curve was evaluated.A total of 10 studies were included. The pooled sensitivity and specificity of drain fluid amylase Day 1 for the diagnosis of postoperative pancreatic fistula were 81% and 87%, respectively (area under the curve was 0.897, diagnostic odds ratios was 16.83 and 95%CI was 12.66-22.36), the pooled sensitivity and specificity of drain fluid amylase Day 3 for the diagnosis of postoperative pancreatic fistula were 56% and 79%, respectively (area under the curve was 0.668, diagnostic odds ratios was 3.26 and 95%CI was 1.83-5.82) CONCLUSIONS: The drain fluid amylase Day 1, instead of drain fluid amylase Day 3, may be a useful criterion for the early identification of postoperative pancreatic fistula, and a value of drain fluid amylase Day 1 over than 1300 U/L was a risk factor of pancreatic fistula. And the diagnostic accuracy and the proposed cut-off levels of drain fluid amylase Day 1 in predicting the postoperative pancreatic fistula will have to be validated by multicenter prospective studies.Novel diagnostics for aggravating pancreatic fistulas at the acute phase after pancreatectomy.To identify sensitive predictors of clinically relevant postoperative pancreatic fistula (POPF) at the acute phase after pancreatectomy.This study included 153 patients diagnosed as having POPFs at postoperative day (POD) 3 after either open pancreatoduodenectomy or distal pancreatectomy between January 2008 and March 2013. The POPFs were categorized into three grades based on the International Study Group on Pancreatic Fistula Definition, and POPFs of grades B or C were considered to be clinically relevant. The predictive performance for the clinically relevant POPF formation of values at PODs 1, 3 and 5 as well as time-dependent changes in levels of inflammatory markers, including white blood cell count, neutrophil count, total lymphocyte count, C-reactive protein (CRP), procalcitonin level, platelet-to-lymphocyte ratio and neutrophil-to-lymphocyte ratio, and amylase content in the drain fluid were compared using the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve and multivariable analyses. A scoring system for the prediction of clinically relevant POPFs was created using five risk factors identified in this study, and its diagnostic performance was also evaluated.Over time, 77 (50%) of 153 enrolled patients followed a protracted course and were categorized as having clinically relevant POPFs. ROC curve analyses revealed that changes in CRP levels from POD 1 to POD 3 had the greatest area under the curve value (0.767) and that an elevated CRP level of 28.4 mg/L yielded the most optimal predictive value for clinically relevant POPFs. Multivariable analyses for the risk factors of clinically relevant POPFs identified invasive carcinomas of the pancreas and elevation of the CRP level (≥ 28.4 mg/L, from POD 1 to POD 3) as independent diagnostic factors for clinically relevant POPFs (OR 2.94, 95%CI: 1.08-8.55, P = 0.035 and OR 4.82, 95%CI: 1.25-20.2, P = 0.022, respectively). A gradual increase in the prevalence of clinically relevant POPFs in proportion to the risk classification score was confirmed. A highly elevated CRP level and a risk score ≥ 8 were significantly associated with a prolonged duration of drain placement and postoperative hospitalization.A steep rise in the serum CRP level from POD 1 to POD 3 was a highly predictive factor for subsequent clinically relevant POPFs.Multivariate logistic regression analysis for prediction of clinically relevant pancreatic fistula in the early phase after pancreaticoduodenectomy.Postoperative pancreatic fistula (PF) remains a major complication after pancreaticoduodenectomy (PD). We aimed to investigate the predictors of clinically relevant PF after PD.We retrospectively analyzed the predictive factors of relevant grade B/C PF using logistic regression analysis of 100 consecutive patients who underwent PD. PF was defined in accordance with the International Study Group on PF (ISGPF).White blood cell count (WBC) of 73.6 × 10(2) /μl, C-reactive protein (CRP) of 9.3 mg/dl and amylase value in drains (d-amylase) of 647 U/I on postoperative day (POD) 4 were proposed as the cut-off values for predicting grade B/C PF with high accuracy by the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve. Multivariate logistic regression analysis revealed that the three factors as significant predictive factors and the predicted probability of detecting grade B/C PF was calculated by the following formula; P = 1/[1 + exp{-(2.033 × WBC+3.269 × CRP+2.698 × d-amylase-4.122)}]. P > 0.5 indicates the prospective incidence of the PF. When the cut-off values of the three significant predictors were substituted into the formula, P always showed above 0.5 if more than two predictors were above their cut-off values, indicating a high probability of grade B/C PF.White blood cell count, CRP and d-amylase on POD4 were predictive factors for clinically relevant PF after PD. These findings indicate that our formula is useful for management of drain after PD.Can the measurement of amylase in drain after distal pancreatectomy predict post-operative pancreatic fistula?The most frequent reason for performing a distal pancreatectomy is the presence of cystic or neuroendocrine tumors, in which the distal pancreatic stump is often soft and non fibrotic. This parenchymal consistence represents the main risk factor for post-operative pancreatic fistula. In order to identify the fistula and assessing its severity postoperative monitoring of amylase from intraperitoneal drains is important.From a retrospective multicentric database analysis were included 33 patients who underwent distal pancreatectomy for pancreatic neoplastic disease.Postoperative pancreatic fistula occurred in four cases. One patient had a ductal adenocarcinoma, two presented with pancreatic endocrine neoplasms and the last one had an intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasia. Two patients underwent open, the other two laparoscopic distal pancreatectomy.Postoperative pancreatic fistulas after distal pancreatectomy worsen the quality of life, prolong the post-operative stay and delay further adjuvant therapy. In patients who underwent distal pancreatectomy literature exposed some advantages deriving from the placement of abdominal drainages only in selected cases and from their early removal. Patients presenting a high risk of pancreatic fistula had higher amylase levels of drainage fluid in the first postoperative day.POPF is the most frequently complication after pancreatectomy. In our analysis DFA1>5000 can be considered as a predictive factor for pancreatic fistula. For this reason, the systematic measurement of amylase in drain fluid in first-postoperative day can be considered a good clinical practice.Amylase level in drains after pancreatoduodenectomy as a predictor of clinically significant pancreatic fistula.Amylase level in drains (ALD) has been proposed as a predictor for the development of a clinically significant pancreatic fistula (CS-PF) in patients undergoing a major pancreatic surgery. This study aimed to determine if the ALD in patients who developed a CS-PF after pancreatoduodenectomy is higher than that for patients with transient fistulae and to establish a threshold value as a predictor of a CS-PF.From January 2002 to December 2012, all patients undergoing pancreatoduodenectomy were enrolled. At least 1 ALD measurement on postoperative day 3 was obtained. Pancreatic fistula (PF) was defined according to the International Study Group on Pancreatic Fistula. Both grade B and C PFs were considered as a CS-PF. We determined the cutoff value with a receiver operating characteristic curve.A total of 135 patients were enrolled. Pancreatic fistula was diagnosed in 36 cases (26.7%). The ALD median values were the following: PF grade A, 1809 U/L; PF grade B, 19,710 U/L; and PF grade C, 27,590 U/L. A drain amylase value of 2820 U/L was determined to be the cutoff for the development of a CS-PF.Patients with CS-PF have higher values of ALD than patients who developed a mild/transient fistula. An ALD higher than 2820 U/L identifies patients likely to present a CS-PF.Utility of drain fluid amylase measurement on the first postoperative day after pancreaticoduodenectomy.Early detection of pancreatic fistula (PF) may improve the outcome after pancreaticoduodenectomy, and exclusion of PF may allow earlier drain removal and accelerate recovery. The aim of the present study was to evaluate the relationship between drain fluid amylase on the first postoperative day (DFA(1)) and PF.This work was designed as a prospective study and included patients undergoing pancreaticoduodenectomy in a single center. For each patient, DFA was measured on the first and fifth postoperative days, and PF was defined by drainage of amylase-rich fluid on the fifth postoperative day (DFA(5) >300 U/l). A cut-off value of DFA(1) was derived, which yielded sensitivity and negative predictive value of 100% for predicting a PF.A total of 70 patients (47% male) who underwent pancreaticoduodenectomy (Whipple procedure: 37; pylorus-preserving procedure: 33) between April 2009 and March 2010 were included. Nine of those patients developed a PF (grade A-2; B-5; C-2). There were two postoperative deaths (3%). The DFA(1) value significantly correlated with DFA(5) (Spearman rank coefficient 0.68; p < 0.0001). The median DFA(1) of patients with a PF (6,205; range 357-23,391) was significantly higher than in patients without a PF (69; range 5-5,180; p = 0.01; unpaired t test). No patient with a PF had a DFA(1) ≤350 U/l, compared to 48/61 patients (79%) without a PF. Using 350 U/l as a cut-off, a low DFA(1) excluded a PF with a sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values of 100, 79, 41, and 100%, respectively.Drain fluid amylase on the DFA(1) after pancreaticoduodenectomy stratifies patients according to likelihood of developing a PF.Routine Drainage After Pancreaticoduodenectomy: Serum Amylase Can Guide Early, Selective Drain Removal.Pancreatic fistula after pancreatic head resection; incidence, significance and management.Anastomotic leak at the pancreatojejunostomy remains a common and dreaded complication after pancreaticoduodenectomy. Our aim was to determine the incidence, presentation, methods of management, and preoperative and postoperative factors that influence the clinical outcome.We reviewed our collective experience with 70 consecutive patients from 1985 to 2000 for a variety of pathologic indications. Clinical, biochemical, intraoperative and postoperative factors were reviewed in an attempt to determine prognostic factors.Nine patients (12%) developed a pancreatic anastomotic leak as determined by increased amylase in drainage fluid (70%), were clinically insignificant and were managed by simple maintenance of intraoperatively placed drains. Although octreotide was used therapeutically in 4 patients (44%), significant, objective response was noted in all patients. Of the clinical, biochemical, intraoperative and postoperative factors reviewed to determine prognostic factors, a large amount of postoperative pancreatic juice output (P = 0.02) was a significant risk factor for pancreatic fistula formation.We conclude that most anastomotic leak at pancreaticoenterostomy after pancreaticoduodenectomy can be managed conservatively. Use of octreotide to aid in closure of the pancreatic leak was satisfactory.Evaluation of a predictive model for pancreatic fistula based on amylase value in drains after pancreatic resection.Amylase value in drains (AVD) is a predictor of pancreatic fistula (PF). We evaluated the accuracy of an AVD-based model.Two hundred thirty-one patients underwent pancreatoduodenectomy with pancreaticojejunostomy (PDPJ) or pancreatoduodenectomy with duct-to-mucosa (PDDTM) and distal pancreatectomy (DP). Patients with AVD greater than 5,000 U/L on postoperative day (POD) 1 underwent AVD measurement on POD5.Sensitivity and specificity of POD1 AVD greater than 5,000 in predicting PF were 71% and 90%, respectively. The sensitivity and specificity of POD5 AVD greater than 200 were 90% and 83%, respectively. AVD greater than 1,000 (for PDPJ) and 2,000 U/L (PDDTM and DP) represented the most accurate cutoffs on POD1. AVD greater than 200 (PDPJ), 300 (PDDTM), and 50 U/L (DP) represented the cutoffs with the highest sensitivity in predicting PF on POD5.AVD-based model for predicting PF after pancreatic resection is an accurate tool, although AVD cutoffs should be evaluated for each type of operation.Usefulness of drain amylase, serum C-reactive protein levels and body temperature to predict postoperative pancreatic fistula after pancreaticoduodenectomy.Postoperative pancreatic fistula (POPF) after pancreaticoduodenectomy (PD) is a worrisome and life-threatening complication. Recently, early drain removal has been recommended as a means of preventing POPF. The present study sought to determine how to distinguish clinical POPF from non-clinical POPF in the early postoperative period after PD to aid in early drain removal.From March 2002 through December 2010, 176 patients underwent PD and were enrolled in this study to examine factors predictive of clinical POPF after PD. POPF was defined and classified according to the International Study Group of Pancreatic Surgery guideline, and grade B/C POPF was defined as clinical POPF.Grade A POPF occurred in 39 (22.2 %) patients, grade B in 19 (10.8 %) patients, and grade C in 11 (6.3 %) patients. Clinical POPF (grade B/C) occurred in 17.1 % of patients. Multivariate analysis revealed male gender and body mass index (BMI) ≥22.5 kg/m(2) to be the independent preoperative risk factors predictive of POPF. Receiver operating characteristic curves showed that the combination of drain amylase ≥750 IU/L, C-reactive protein (CRP) ≥20 mg/dL, and body temperature ≥37.5 °C on postoperative day 3 could effectively distinguish clinical POPF from non-clinical POPF. Sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy were 84.6, 98.2, and 95.7 %, respectively.Male gender and BMI ≥22.5 were the independent preoperative predictive risk factors for POPF. We assume that when amylase is <750 IU/L, serum CRP is <20 mg/dL, and body temperature is <37.5 °C the drain can safely be removed, even if POPF is indicated.Amylase value in drains after pancreatic resection as predictive factor of postoperative pancreatic fistula: results of a prospective study in 137 patients.The correlation of the amylase value in drains (AVD) with the development of pancreatic fistula (PF) is still unclear.The purpose of this study was to identify within the first postoperative day (POD1) the predictive role of different risks factors, including AVD, in the development of PF.We prospectively investigated 137 patients who underwent major pancreatic resections. PF was defined and graded in accordance with the International Study Group on PF.We considered 101 pancreaticoduodenectomies and 36 distal resections. The overall incidence of PF (A, B, and C grades) was 19.7% and it was 14.8% after pancreaticoduodenectomy and 33.3% after distal resection. All PF occurred in "soft" remnant pancreas. The PF developed in patients with a POD1 median AVD of 10,000 U/L, whereas patients without PF had a median AVD of 1222 U/L (P < 0.001). We established a cut-off of 5000 U/L POD1 AVD for univariate and multivariate analysis. The area under the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve was 0.922 (P < 0.001). The predicting risk factors selected in the univariate setting were "soft" pancreas (P = 0.005; odds ratio [OR]: 1.54; 95% CI: 1.32-1.79) and AVD (P < 0.001; OR: 5.66; 95% CI: 3.6-8.7; positive predictive value 59%; negative predictive value 98%), whereas in multivariate analysis the predicting risk factor was the POD1 AVD (P < 0.001; OR: 68.4; 95% CI: 14.8-315). Only 2 PFs were detected with AVD <5000 U/L and both were in pancreatogastric anastomosis (P = 0.053).AVD in POD1 > or =5000 U/L is the only significant predictive factor of PF development.Does postoperative drain amylase predict pancreatic fistula after pancreatectomy?Previous studies suggest that after pancreatectomy, drain fluid amylase obtained on postoperative day 1 (DFA1) >5,000 U/L correlates with the development of postoperative pancreatic fistula (PF).(1,2) We sought to validate whether DFA1 is a clinically useful predictor of PF and to evaluate whether DFA1 correlates with PF severity.Using a prospective database, we reviewed records from patients having pancreatectomy between 2010 and 2012. Presence and grade of PF were determined using the consensus guidelines from the International Study Group on Pancreatic Fistula (ISGPF).(1) RESULTS: Sixty-three patients who underwent pancreatectomy had a documented DFA1. There were 27 (43%) who developed PF: 2 (7%) were grade A, 18 grade B (67%), and 7 were grade C (26%). Median DFA1 in patients with PF (4,600 U/L, range 32 to 16,900 U/L) was significantly higher than in those without PF (45 U/L, range 2 to 5,840 U/L; p < 0.001). When DFA1 was analyzed at varying cutoff values, correlation of DFA1 with PF was high. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), and negative predictive value (NPV) were assessed at varying levels of DFA1. Highest sensitivity (96%) and NPV (96%) were obtained with a cutoff DFA1 of <100 U/L. On multivariate analysis, DFA1 >100 U/L was the only significant predictor of PF when controlling for gland texture, duct size, pathology, and neoadjuvant radiation. There was no statistically significant relationship between DFA1 and PF grade.In patients undergoing pancreatic resection, a cutoff DFA1 of 100 U/L resulted in high sensitivity and NPV. Early drain removal may be safe in these patients. Further studies are recommended to validate the role of DFA1 in excluding PF and assisting in management of surgical drains.Drain Management after Pancreatoduodenectomy: Reappraisal of a Prospective Randomized Trial Using Risk Stratification.A recent randomized trial used the Fistula Risk Score (FRS) to develop guidelines for selective drainage based on clinically relevant fistula (CR-POPF) risk. Additionally, postoperative day (POD) 1 drain and serum amylase have been identified as accurate postoperative predictors of CR-POPF. This study sought to identify patients who may benefit from selective drainage, as well as the optimal timing for drain removal after pancreatoduodenectomy.One hundred six pancreatoduodenectomies from a previously reported RCT were assessed using risk-adjustment. The incidence of CR-POPF was compared between FRS risk cohorts. Drain and serum amylase values from POD 1 were evaluated using receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis to establish cut-offs predictive of CR-POPF occurrence. A regression analysis compared drain removal randomizations (POD 3 vs POD 5).Three-quarters of patients had moderate/high CR-POPF risk. This group had a CR-POPF rate of 36.3% vs 7.7% among negligible/low risk patients (p = 0.005). The areas under the ROC curve for CR-POPF prediction using POD 1 drain and serum amylase values were 0.800 (p = 0.000001; 95% CI 0.70-0.90) and 0.655 (p = 0.012; 95% CI 0.55-0.77), respectively. No significant serum amylase cut-offs were identified. Moderate/high risk patients with POD 1 drain amylase ≤ 5,000 U/L had significantly lower rates of CR-POPF when randomized to POD 3 drain removal (4.2% vs 38.5%; p = 0.003); moreover, these patients experienced fewer complications and shorter hospital stays.A clinical care protocol is proposed whereby drains are recommended for moderate/high FRS risk patients, but may be omitted in patients with negligible/low risk. Drain amylase values in moderate/high risk patients should then be evaluated on POD 1 to determine the optimal timing for drain removal. Moderate/high risk patients with POD 1 drain amylase ≤ 5,000 U/L have lower rates of CR-POPF with POD 3 (vs POD ≥ 5) drain removal; early drain removal is recommended for these patients.Predictive risk factors for clinically relevant pancreatic fistula analyzed in 1,239 patients with pancreaticoduodenectomy: multicenter data collection as a project study of pancreatic surgery by the Japanese Society of Hepato-Biliary-Pancreatic Surgery.It is important to predict the development of clinically relevant pancreatic fistula (grade B/C) in the early period after pancreaticoduodenectomy (PD). This study has been carried out as a project study of the Japanese Society of Hepato-Biliary-Pancreatic Surgery (JSHPBS) to evaluate the predictive factors associated with clinically relevant pancreatic fistula (grade B/C).The data of 1,239 patients from 11 medical institutions who had undergone PD between July 2005 and June 2009 were retrospectively analyzed to review patient characteristics and perioperative and postoperative parameters.A drain amylase level >4,000 IU/L on postoperative day (POD) 1 was proposed as the cut-off level to predict clinical relevant pancreatic fistula by the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve. The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of this cut-off level were 62.2, 89.0, and 84.8%, respectively. A multivariate logistic regression analysis revealed that male [odds ratio (OR) 1.7, P = 0.039], intraoperative bleeding >1,000 ml (OR 2.5, P = 0.001), soft pancreas (OR 2.7, P = 0.001), and drain amylase level on POD 1 >4,000 IU/L (OR 8.6, P < 0.001) were the significant predictive factors for clinical pancreatic fistula.The four predictive risk factors identified here can provide useful information useful for tailoring postoperative management of clinically relevant pancreatic fistula (grade B/C).Schematic pancreatic configuration: a risk assessment for postoperative pancreatic fistula after pancreaticoduodenectomy.Postoperative pancreatic fistula (POPF) remains a serious complication after pancreaticoduodenectomy (PD). Preoperative risk assessment of POPF is desirable in careful preparation for operation. The aim of this study was to assess simple and accurate risk factors for clinically relevant POPF based on a schematic understanding of the pancreatic configuration using preoperative multidetector computed tomography.Three hundred and eighteen consecutive patients who underwent PD in the National Cancer Center Hospital East between November 2006 and March 2013 were investigated. Pre-, intra-, and postoperative clinicopathological findings as well as pancreatic configuration data were analyzed for the risk of clinically relevant POPF. POPF was defined according to the International Study Group of Pancreatic Fistula classification. POPF grade A occurred in 52 patients (16.4%), grade B in 84 (26.4%), and grade C in 6 (1.9%).Independent risk factors for POPF grade B/C included main pancreatic duct diameter (MPDd) < 2 mm (P = 0.001), parenchymal thickness ≥ 8 mm (P = 0.018), not performing portal vein/superior mesenteric vein resection (P = 0.004), and amylase level of drainage fluid on postoperative day 3 ≥ 375 IU/L (P < 0.001). Pancreatic configuration data including MPDd and parenchymal thickness were good indicators of clinically relevant POPF.Low drain fluid amylase predicts absence of pancreatic fistula following pancreatectomy.Improvements in the ability to predict pancreatic fistula could enhance patient outcomes. Previous studies demonstrate that drain fluid amylase on postoperative day 1 (DFA1) is predictive of pancreatic fistula. We sought to assess the accuracy of DFA1 and to identify a reliable DFA1 threshold under which pancreatic fistula is ruled out.Patients undergoing pancreatic resection from November 1, 2011 to December 31, 2012 were selected from the American College of Surgeons-National Surgical Quality Improvement Program Pancreatectomy Demonstration Project database. Pancreatic fistula was defined as drainage of amylase-rich fluid with drain continuation >7 days, percutaneous drainage, or reoperation for a pancreatic fluid collection. Univariate and multi-variable regression models were utilized to identify factors predictive of pancreatic fistula.DFA1 was recorded in 536 of 2,805 patients who underwent pancreatic resection, including pancreaticoduodenectomy (n = 380), distal pancreatectomy (n = 140), and enucleation (n = 16). Pancreatic fistula occurred in 92/536 (17.2%) patients. DFA1, increased body mass index, small pancreatic duct size, and soft texture were associated with fistula (p < 0.05). A DFA1 cutoff value of <90 U/L demonstrated the highest negative predictive value of 98.2%. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve confirmed the predictive relationship of DFA1 and pancreatic fistula.Low DFA1 predicts the absence of a pancreatic fistula. In patients with DFA1 < 90 U/L, early drain removal is advisable.Diagnostic value of abdominal drainage in individual risk assessment of pancreatic fistula following pancreaticoduodenectomy.The use of prophylactic abdominal drainage following pancreaticoduodenectomy (PD) is controversial as its therapeutic value is uncertain. However, the diagnosis of postoperative pancreatic fistula (POPF), the main cause of PD-associated morbidity, is often based on drain pancreatic amylase (DPA) levels. The aim of this study was to assess the predictive value of DPA, plasma pancreatic amylase (PPA) and serum C-reactive protein (CRP) for diagnosing POPF after PD.Patients undergoing PD with prophylactic drainage between 2008 and 2012 were studied prospectively. DPA, PPA and CRP levels were obtained daily. Differences between groups with clinically relevant POPF (International Study Group on Pancreatic Fistula (ISGPF) grade B/C) and without clinically relevant POPF (no POPF or ISGPF grade A) were evaluated. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analyses were performed to determine the value of DPA, PPA and CRP in prediction of POPF. Risk profiles for clinically relevant POPF were constructed and related to the intraoperative pancreatic risk assessment.Fifty-nine (18.7 per cent) of 315 patients developed clinically relevant POPF. DPA, PPA and CRP levels on postoperative day (POD) 1-3 differed significantly between the study groups. In predicting POPF, the DPA level on POD 1 (cut-off at 1322 units/l; odds ratio (OR) 24.61, 95 per cent confidence interval 11.55 to 52.42) and POD 2 (cut-off at 314 units/l; OR 35.45, 14.07 to 89.33) was superior to that of PPA on POD 1 (cut-off at 177 units/l; OR 13.67, 6.46 to 28.94) and POD 2 (cut-off at 98 units/l; OR 16.97, 8.33 to 34.59). When DPA was combined with CRP (cut-off on POD 3 at 202 mg/l; OR 16.98, 8.43 to 34.21), 90.3 per cent of postoperative courses could be predicted correctly (OR 44.14, 16.89 to 115.38).The combination of serum CRP and DPA adequately predicted the development of clinically relevant pancreatic fistula following PD.Risk scoring system and predictor for clinically relevant pancreatic fistula after pancreaticoduodenectomy.To establish a scoring system to predict clinically relevant postoperative pancreatic fistula (CR-POPF) after pancreaticoduodenectomy (PD).The clinical records of 921 consecutive patients who underwent PD between 2008 and 2013 were reviewed retrospectively. Postoperative pancreatic fistula (POPF) was defined and classified by the international study group of pancreatic fistula (ISGPF). We used a logistic regression model to determine the independent risk factors of CR-POPF and developed a scoring system based on the regression coefficient of the logistic regression model. The optimal cut-off value to divide the risk strata was determined by the Youden index. The patients were divided into two groups (low risk and high risk). The independent sample t test was used to detect differences in the means of drain amylase on postoperative day (POD) 1, 2 and 3. The optimal cut-off level of the drain amylase to distinguish CR-POPF from non-clinical POPF in the two risk strata groups was determined using the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves.Grade A POPF occurred in 106 (11.5%) patients, grade B occurred in 57 (6.2%) patients, and grade C occurred in 32 (3.5%) patients. A predictive scoring system for CR-POPF (0-6 points) was constructed using the following four factors: 1 point for each body mass index ≥ 28 [odds ratio (OR) = 3.86; 95% confidence interval (CI): 1.92-7.75, P = 0.00], soft gland texture (OR = 4.50; 95%CI, 2.53-7.98, P = 0.00), and the difference between the blood loss and transfusion in operation ≥ 800 mL (OR = 3.45; 95%CI, 1.92-7.75, P = 0.00); and from 0 points for a 5 mm or greater duct diameter to 3 points for a less than 2 mm duct (OR = 8.97; 95%CI: 3.70-21.77, P = 0.00). The ROC curve showed that the area under the curve of this score was 0.812. A score of 3 points was suggested to be the best cut-off value (Youden index = 0.485). In the low risk group, a drain amylase level ≥ 3600 U/L on POD3 could distinguish CR-POPF from non-clinical POPF (the sensitivity and specificity were 75% and 85%, respectively). In the high risk group, the best cut-off was a drain amylase level of 1600 (the sensitivity and specificity were 77 and 63%, respectively).A 6-point scoring system accurately predicted the occurrence of CR-POPF. In addition, a drain amylase level on POD3 might be a predictor of this complication.Persisting ratio of total amylase output in drain fluid can predict postoperative clinical pancreatic fistula.A consistent predictor for pancreatic fistula (PF) development in the early period after pancreatic resection is still lacking.A total of 54 consecutive patients undergoing pancreatic resection were enrolled between June 2007 and April 2010. Pancreaticoduodenectomy (PD) and distal pancreatectomy (DP) were performed in 38 and 16 patients, respectively. For the purpose of finding an early predictor for PF development, we investigated drain amylase levels (d-Amy, IU/mL), drain output volume (d-Vol, mL/day) and drain amylase output (Amy-V, IU/day) on postoperative days (POD) 1 and 3. Amy-V was calculated as the product of d-Amy and d-Vol, and was expressed as the sum of values obtained from all drains. In addition, the ratio of d-Amy or Amy-V on POD3 to that on POD1 was calculated as the persisting ratio in each patient.The overall incidence of clinical PF (International Study Group on Pancreatic Fistula Grade B and C) was 16.7%, occurring in 13.1% after PD and 25% after DP. All PF occurred in cases with a remnant pancreas of soft texture. There was no significant difference in d-Amy, d-Vol, or Amy-V on POD1 and POD3 between patients with and without clinical PF. The persisting ratio of Amy-V was significantly lower in patients without clinical PF compared to those with clinical PF (p = 0.029). Furthermore, the persisting ratio of Amy-V was significantly lower in patients with Grade A PF compared to those with Grade B PF (p = 0.03).The persisting ratio of drain amylase output is a new significant predictive factor for clinical PF development.Is routine imaging necessary after pancreatic resection? An appraisal of postoperative ultrasonography for the detection of pancreatic fistula.This study aimed to assess whether routine transabdominal ultrasonography (US) is clinically helpful for the early detection of postoperative pancreatic fistula (PF).In a prospective cohort of patients undergoing partial pancreatectomy, US was performed on postoperative day (POD) 3. Potential predictors of PF, including amylase value in drains (AVD) on POD 1, were investigated. A tree-based classification model of the independent predictors of PF was also performed.One hundred seventy-three patients were analyzed. A peripancreatic collection on US and an AVD 5000 U/L or greater on POD 1 were predictors of PF. In the tree-based classification model, patients were stratified by AVD on POD 1. For values less than 5000 U/L (incidence of PF, 11.3%), US had a sensitivity of 23.1% and a specificity of 97.5%. For AVD 5000 U/L or greater (incidence of PF, 70.7%), sensitivity was 46.3% and specificity was 100%.Despite the presence of a peripancreatic collection as a predictor of PF, US-as a diagnostic test-resulted to be highly specific but poorly sensitive even in the tree-based classification model. Therefore, its role does not seem to be clinically relevant and does not add value to AVD on POD 1, which remains the most powerful and relevant early predictor of PF.Risk factors of pancreatic fistula after pancreaticoduodenectomy - patients with low drain amylase level on postoperative day 1 are safe from developing pancreatic fistula.Based on the criteria of International Study Group on Pancreatic Fistula (ISGPF), the risk factors for grade B/C pancreatic fistula (PF) after pancreaticoduodenectomy (PD) were analyzed in this study.Between October 2006 and August 2010, 114 consecutive patients underwent PD at National Hospital Organization Osaka National Hospital. We compared the clinicopathological features between patients with grade B/C PF and those with PF-free/grade A PF. We also examined the relationship between PF formation and the drain amylase level on post-operative day (POD) 1 and POD 3.Eighteen patients (15.8%) developed grade B/C P. Of these patients, four patients underwent reoperation. The mortality rate in patients with grade B/C PF was 5.6%(1/18). The non-dilated pancreatic duct (≤ 3mm) was the only independent risk factor for grade B/C PF by a multivariate analysis (p=0.026). There were 45 patients who showed low (≤ three times serum amylase level)drain amylase level on POD 1 and none of them developed PF.Although our study demonstrated that the non-dilated pancreatic duct is significantly correlated with the increased incidence of grade B/CPE patients with low amylase level of drainage fluid on POD 1 are thought to be safe from developing PE.Pancreatic anastomotic leakage after pancreaticoduodenectomy. Risk factors, clinical predictors, and management (single center experience).Postoperative pancreatic fistula (POPF) after pancreaticoduodenectomy (PD) remains a challenge even at high-volume centers.This study was designed to analyze perioperative risk factors for POPF after PD and evaluate the factors that predict the extent and severity of leak. Demographic data, preoperative, intraoperative, and postoperative variables were collected.A total of 471 consecutive patients underwent PD in our center. Fifty-seven patients (12.1 %) developed a POPF of any type; 21 patients (4.5 %) had a fistula type A, 22 patients (4.7 %) had a fistula type B, and the remaining 14 patients (3 %) had a POPF type C. Cirrhotic liver (P = 0.05), BMI > 25 kg/m(2) (P = 0.0001), soft pancreas (P = 0.04), pancreatic duct diameter <3 mm (0.0001), pancreatic duct located <3 mm from the posterior border (P = 0.02) were significantly associated with POPF. With the multivariate analysis, both BMI and pancreatic duct diameter were demonstrated to be independent factors. The hospital mortality in this series was 11 patients (2.3 %), and the development of POPF type C was associated with a significantly increased mortality (7/14 patients). The following factors were predictors of clinically evident POPF: a postoperative day (POD) 1 and 5 drain amylase level >4,000 IU/L, WBC, pancreatic duct diameter <3 mm, and pancreatic texture.Cirrhotic liver, BMI, soft pancreas, pancreatic duct diameter <3 mm, pancreatic duct near the posterior border are risk factors for development of POPF. In addition a drain amylase level >4,000 IU/L on POD 1 and 5, WBC, pancreatic duct diameter, pancreatic texture may be predictors of POPF B, C.Drain amylase value as an early predictor of pancreatic fistula after cephalic duodenopancreatectomy.To determine predictors of clinically relevant pancreatic fistulas (CRPF) by measuring drain fluid amylase (DFA) in the early postoperative period.This prospective clinical study included 382 patients with periampullary tumors that were surgically resected at our department between March 2005 and October 2012. A cephalic duodenopancreatectomy (DP) was performed on all patients. Two closed suction drains were placed at the end of the surgery. The highest postoperative DFA value was recorded and analyzed during the first three postoperative days and on subsequent days if the drains were kept longer. Pancreatic fistula (PF) was classified according to the International Study Group of Pancreatic Fistula (ISGPF) criteria. Postoperative complications were defined according to the Dindo-Clavien classification. All data were statistically analyzed. The optimal thresholds of DFA levels on the first, second and third postoperative days were estimated by constructing receiver operating curves, generated by calculating the sensitivities and specificities of the DFA levels. The DFA level limits were used to differentiate between the group without PF and the groups with biochemical pancreatic fistula (BPF) and CRPF.Pylorus-preserving duodenopancreatectomy was performed on 289 (75.6%) patients, while the remaining patients underwent a classic Whipple procedure (CW). The total incidence of PF was 37.7% (grade A 22.8%, grade B 11.0% and grade C 3.9%). Soft pancreatic texture (SPT) was present in 58.3% of patients who developed PF. Mortality was 4.2%. The median DFA value on the first postoperative day (DFA1) in patients who developed PF was 4520 U/L (range 350-99000 U/L) for grade A fistula (BPF) with a SPT and a diameter of the main pancreatic duct (MPD) of ≤ 3 mm. For grade B/C (CRPF), the median DFA1 value was 8501 U/L (range 377-92060 U/L) with a SPT and MPD of ≤ 3 mm. These values were significantly higher when compared to the patients who did not have PF (122; range 5-37875 U/L). The upper limit of DFA values for the first 3 postoperative days in the examined stages of PF were: DFA1 1200 U/L for the BPF and CRPF; DFA3 350 U/L for BPF and DFA3 800 U/L for CRPF. The determined values were highly significant and demonstrated a reliable diagnostic test for both BPF and CRPF.DFA1 ≥ 1200 U/L is an important predictive factor for PF of any degree. The trend of DFA3 (decrease of < 50%) compared to DFA1 is a significant factor in the differentiation of CRPF from transient BPF.Clinically relevant pancreas-related infectious complication after pancreaticoenteral anastomosis could be predicted by the parameters obtained on postoperative day 3.Pancreatic fistula or pancreas-related infectious complications are one of the most common surgical complications after pancreatic surgery. The aims of this study were, first, to reveal the risk factors for clinically relevant pancreas-related infectious complications and, second, to identify those risk factors that are obtainable within the first 3 postoperative days.One hundred seven consecutive patients who underwent pancreaticoenteral anastomosis between October 2007 and November 2010 were enrolled.There were 36 patients with clinical pancreas-related infectious complications among 107 in this series of patients. Univariate and multivariate analyses revealed that a narrow main pancreatic duct diameter (<3 mm) was an independent risk factor for clinically relevant pancreas-related infectious complication. Univariate and multivariate analyses also revealed that a body temperature of 38°C or higher on postoperative day 3 (POD3), a leukocyte count of 9.8 × 10(9)/L or greater on POD3, and a drain fluid amylase level of 3000 IU/L or higher on POD3 were significant predictive factors for clinically relevant pancreas-related infectious complication for 58 patients with a narrow main pancreatic duct.In view of the clinical variables obtained on POD3, such as amylase levels in drain effluent, body temperature, and leukocyte count, clinically relevant pancreas-related infections could be predicted well.Does drainage fluid amylase reflect pancreatic leakage after pancreaticoduodenectomy?This study tried to determine if drainage fluid amylase reflects pancreatic leakage after pancreaticoduodenectomy and to determine the factors affecting the drainage amylase level. Patients undergoing pancreaticoduodenectomy were recruited. The drainage amylase was measured from postoperative day (POD) 1 to POD 7. Direct evidence of pancreatic leakage was provided by upper gastrointestinal studies using a water-soluble contrast medium and methylene blue dye in the pancreaticogastrostomy group or by pancreaticography with injected contrast medium via an exteriorized pancreatic stent in the pancreaticojejunostomy group on POD 7. A total of 37 patients were recruited. The drainage amylase level was higher than the normal serum amylase (>or= 190 U/L) in more than half of the cases on the initial POD 2 specimen, with a median of 745 U/L on POD 1 and 663 U/L on POD 2. The drainage amylase level was more than three times the normal serum amylase level (>or= 190 x 3 U/L) in 56.8% on POD 1, in 51.4% on POD 2, and in nearly one-third on POD 7 (29.7%). However, no pancreatic leakage occurred in any of the patients with a drainage amylase of >or= 190 U/L. Only one case of pancreatic leakage with a small amount of drainage fluid (10 ml) and low amylase level (74 U/L), was noted. Soft pancreatic parenchyma and a nondilated pancreatic duct were significantly associated with higher drainage amylase levels. In conclusion, biochemical leakage defined by amylase-rich drainage fluid might have no clinical significance and was not necessarily clinical pancreatic leakage following pancreaticoduodenectomy.[Analysis of the drainage fluid after cephalic duodenopancreatectomy: a reliable clinical criterion].The authors have retrospectively analysed the drainage fluid of 39 patients undergoing Whipple's operation over a 18-year period. The aim of the study was to assess whether the volume and amylase concentration of the drainage fluid were good criteria of healing of the pancreatico-jejunal anastomosis. The patients have been divided into two groups: Group I (30 patients) with no complications at the pancreatico-jejunostomy--Group II (9 patients) with a pancreatic leak. The analysis of the volume, amylase concentration and amylase index (Log of the amylase concentration x volume) showed that the groups had clearly different profiles: in group I all three criteria were rapidly decreasing, while they remained abnormally high in group II. Those criteria may help the clinician in the monitoring of individual patients; they also may prove useful in prospective studies evaluating new means of prevention of this anastomosis.Diagnosis of postoperative pancreatic fistula.Pancreatic fistula (PF) is a major source of morbidity after pancreatectomy. The International Study Group on Pancreatic Fistula (ISGPF) defines postoperative fistula by an amylase concentration in the abdominal drain of more than three times the serum value on day 3 or more after surgery. However, this definition fails to identify some clinical fistulas. This study examined the association between lipase measured in abdominal drainage fluid and PF.Amylase and lipase levels in the abdominal drain were measured 3 days after pancreatic resection. Grade B and C fistulas were classified as clinical fistulas, regardless of whether the measured amylase concentration was considered positive or negative. The PF group included patients with a clinical fistula and/or those with positive amylase according to the ISGPF definition.Sixty-five patients were included. The median level of lipase was higher in patients with positive amylase than in those with negative amylase: 12,176 versus 64 units/l (P < 0·001). The lipase level was 16,500 units/l in patients with a clinical fistula and 224 units/l in those without a clinical fistula (P = 0·001). Patients with a PF had a higher lipase concentration than those without: 7852 versus 64 units/l (P < 0·001). A lipase level higher than 500 units/l yielded a sensitivity of 88 per cent and a specificity of 75 per cent for PF. For clinical fistulas the sensitivity was 93 per cent and specificity 77 per cent when the threshold for lipase was 1000 units/l.Lipase concentration in the abdominal drain correlated with PF. A threshold of 1000 units/l yielded a high sensitivity and specificity for the diagnosis of clinical PF.The usefulness of drain data to identify a clinically relevant pancreatic anastomotic leak after pancreaticoduodenectomy?Pancreatic anastomotic leak (leak) remains a persistent problem after pancreaticoduodenectomy (PD). Recent reports indicate a mean occurrence of 10% with a range of 2%-28% of patients. However, valid comparisons for these studies cannot be made because the definition of leak is variable, and many patients deemed to have a leak are not sick. The aim of this study was to determine the meaning of the volume and amylase content of the effluent from surgical drains by comparing these values to actual clinical outcomes. From January 1996 to July 2002, 207 consecutive patients underwent PD. We considered a leak to be present if greater than 30 ml/day of drainage was observed from drains and if that drainage contained an amylase-rich fluid (greater than 5X serum) on or after postoperative day (POD) 5. Cases were then divided into three groups-no leak, chemical leak only (leak but asymptomatic), and a clinical leak group (leak that required therapeutic intervention, reoperation, readmission, or prolonged length of stay). Then the drainage volume and its amylase concentration for every postoperative day were compared between the three groups. There were no operative or hospital deaths, and the mean length of stay (LOS) was 11.2 +/- 6.1 days. Prolonged LOS was set at greater than 17 days (one standard deviation beyond the mean LOS for all cases). Leak was observed in 14% of cases (n = 29) and the patients were subsequently divided into these groups: no leak (n = 178), chemical leak only (n = 12), and clinical leak (n = 17). Surprisingly, the daily drain amylase values did not differ between the chemical leak group and the clinical leak group. The daily volume of drainage on POD 5-8 for the clinical leak group was significantly greater than the volumes of the other two groups, so that a combination of greater than 200 ml/day of drainage on POD 5 with an amylase greater than 5X serum had a positive predictive value (PPV) of 84% and a negative predictive value (NPV) of 99% for a clinically relevant leak. We used broad criteria from drainage effluent to include as many potential leaks as possible. This broad definition of leak selected 14% of the PD patients as having a leak; within this group, all of the clinical complications of leak occurred. By increasing the volume criteria from greater than 30 ml per day to greater than 200 ml per day, the PPV was increased from 59% to 84% while keeping NPV at 99%. Drain data based on the volume and amylase criteria of this study may be useful for early detection of a leak that will have clinical impact. This study's criteria for leak may be a good definition to design a clinical trial.Early Drain Removal--The Middle Ground Between the Drain Versus No Drain Debate in Patients Undergoing Pancreaticoduodenectomy: A Prospective Validation Study.To perform an unbiased assessment of first postoperative day (POD 1) drain amylase level and pancreatic fistula (PF) after pancreaticoduodenectomy (PD).Recent evidence demonstrated that drain abandonment in PD is unsafe. Early drain amylase levels have been proposed as predictors of PF after PD, allowing for selection of patients for early drain removal.Daily drain amylase levels were correlated with the development of PF in 2 independent cohorts of patients undergoing PD: training cohort (n = 126; year 2008) and validation cohort (n = 369; years 2009-2012).POD 1 drain amylase level had the highest predictive ability (concordance index: 0.911) for PF in the training cohort. An amylase level of 612 U/L or higher showed the best accuracy (86%), sensitivity (93%), and specificity (79%). Thus, a cutoff value of 600 U/L was utilized. In the validation cohort, 229 (62.1%) patients had a POD 1 drain amylase level of lower than 600 U/L, and PF developed in only 2 (0.9%) cases; whereas in patients with POD 1 drain amylase level of 600 U/L or higher (n = 140) the PF rate was 31.4% (odds ratio [OR] = 52, P < 0.0001). On multivariate analysis, POD 1 drain amylase level of lower than 600 U/L (OR = 0.0192, P < 0.0001) was a stronger predictor of the absence of PF than pancreatic gland texture (OR = 0.193, P = 0.002) and duct diameter (OR = 0.861, P = 0.835).After PD, the risk of PF is less than 1% if POD 1 drain amylase level is lower than 600 U/L. We propose that in this group, which comprise more than 60% of patients, drains should be removed on POD 1.A simple algorithm for drain management after pancreaticoduodenectomy.Pancreatic fistula (PF) continues to be the Achilles' heel of pancreaticoduodenectomy (PD) with both morbidity and mortality linked to its occurrence. The optimal drain management strategy after PD remains unclear. We evaluated drain amylase (DA) levels on postoperative Day (POD) 0 to 5 in 76 consecutive patients undergoing PD to determine the patterns associated with PF. Of these 76 patients, eight patients (11%) developed Grade A, B, or C PF by International Study Group of Pancreatic Fistula criteria. POD 1 DA levels correlated closely with PF rates when high (greater than 5000 U/L, 100% PF rate) and low (less than 100 U/L, 2% PF rate). In patients with intermediate POD 1 DA (100 to 5000 U/L), 42 and 74 per cent had low DA levels on POD 3 and 5, respectively, and the PF rate was four of 31 (13%). Overall, the temporal pattern of decreasing DA levels after PD correlates closely with the risk of PF, and only two patients (5%) developed PF after early DA levels had normalized. Based on these data, we propose an algorithm of monitoring DA daily with drain removal when the level is less than 100 U/L. In our patient group drain removal would have occurred on a mean of 1.8 days and median 1 day after surgery.Options and limitations in applying the fistula classification by the International Study Group for Pancreatic Fistula.Because of its retrospective character, the classification system of the International Study Group of Pancreatic Fistula (ISGPF) lacks prognostic capacity regarding fistula-related complications. This study aimed to evaluate the options and limitations of the ISGPF classification system and to identify risk factors with respect to clinical decision making.Between 1992 and 2009, 1966 patients underwent surgery of the pancreas. All patient data were entered into a prospective clinical data management system.After surgery, 276 patients (14%) developed postoperative pancreatic fistula (POPF). ISGPF type A fistula was seen in 69 patients (25%), type B in 110 (39.9%), and type C in 97 (34.1%). Solely due to their death, 16 patients had to be classified as type C fistula, even though they suffered only type A or B. Compared to genuine C fistulas, we were not able to detect any significant predictors, which may allow to distinguish the development in their further clinical course. The level of drainage amylase is of no use, whereas univariate analysis identified underlying disease, type of operation, and high levels of serum amylase or bilirubin on the day of onset of POPF to be prognostic parameters for reoperation. Multivariate analysis found elevated serum C-reactive protein to be an independent factor for increased in-hospital mortality.The ISGPF classification system has its limitations in clinical decision making, because it does not adequately describe a large subgroup of patients. To improve clinical decision making about management of patients, it is crucial that the ISGPF classification system is merged with newer clinical data.Implementation of an Enhanced Recovery Pathway After Pancreaticoduodenectomy in Patients with Low Drain Fluid Amylase.The safety and feasibility of an enhanced recovery pathway (ERP) after pancreatic surgery is largely unknown. Our aim was to prospectively evaluate a targeted ERP after pancreaticoduodenectomy (PD), using first postoperative day (POD) drain fluid amylase (DFA1) values to identify patients at low risk of pancreatic fistula (PF).Non-randomized cohort study of 130 consecutive patients. Perioperative outcomes were compared before (pre-ERP; N=65) and after (post-ERP; N=65) implementation of an ERP. Patients in each group were stratified according to the risk of PF using DFA1<350 IU/l. Low-risk patients in the post-ERP group were selected for early oral intake and early drain removal.81/130 patients had a DFA1<350. Incidence of PF was significantly lower in low-risk patients (9 vs. 45%, P=0.0001). In low-risk patients, morbidity (43 vs. 36%) and mortality (2.7 vs. 4.5%) were similar for both pre- and post-ERP patients. Hospital stay (median 9 vs. 7 days, P=0.03) and 30-day readmissions (17 vs. 2%, P=0.04) were lower in low-risk patients in the post-ERP group. In high-risk patients, there was no difference in outcomes between pre- and post-ERP.Patients at low risk of PF after PD can be identified by first POD DFA1. Enhanced recovery after PD is safe and leads to improved short-term outcomes in low-risk patients.Prediction of pancreatic fistula by amylase levels of drainage fluid on the first day after pancreatectomy.We investigated whether it would be useful to monitor amylase levels of drainage fluid after pancreatic surgery for prediction of pancreatic fistula.Twenty-six cases in which amylase levels of drainage fluid were determined after pancreatic surgery, were divided into 14 cases who did not develop pancreatic fistula and 12 cases who developed pancreatic fistula. Changes in amylase levels of sera and urine as well as drainage fluid were monitored.Amylase levels of drainage fluid were significantly higher in cases with pancreatic fistula than in cases without pancreatic fistula on the first postoperative day, but those levels in both groups decreased until the 7th postoperative day without significant difference. However, those levels in cases with pancreatic fistula significantly increased from the 9th postoperative day whereas the levels in cases without pancreatic fistula further decreased. There was no significant difference in amylase levels of sera or urine.Amylase levels of drainage fluid on the first postoperative day may be useful to predict development of pancreatic fistula and to plan appropriate management.Pancreatoduodenectomy: role of drain fluid analysis in the management of pancreatic fistula.Pancreatic fistula remains an important cause of death following pancreatoduodenectomy. There is still uncertainty regarding the use of drains following pancreatoduodenectomy with recent reports suggesting that it might be harmful with increased complications. We evaluated the use of drain fluid analysis in the management of patients following pancreatoduodenectomy.A prospective study was conducted on all patients undergoing pancreatoduodenectomy at two hospitals between April 2004 and August 2006. Drain fluid analysis was carried out from day 3 to day 5. These data were collected with the clinical pictures of the patients and with subsequent radiological assessment.Fifty consecutive patients underwent modified extended pancreatoduodenectomy for a periampullary tumour. In patients with no clinical evidence of a fistula, the mean postoperative drain fluid amylase levels were as follows: on postoperative day 3 it was 262 U/mL (standard error of mean 69), on postoperative day 4 it was 112 U/mL (standard error of mean 47) and on postoperative day 5 it was 125 U/mL (standard error of mean 64). Only three (6/6, 50%) of these patients had clinical features suggestive of a leak and were found to have a pancreatic fistula on subsequent imaging. There was no correlation between the total or mean volumes of drainage and development of a pancreatic fistula.The drain fluid analysis did not provide additional information that was not already evident from the clinical picture of the patient. Drain fluid analysis had no effect on patients with a biochemical leak only. Patients who had a significant disruption of their pancreatic anastamosis did not need biochemical analysis as the character, that is, turbidity of the drain fluid was an equally reliable indicator of the underlying pathology.Negative predictive value of drain amylase concentration for development of pancreatic fistula after pancreaticoduodenectomy.Post-operative pancreatic fistula (POPF) is the major source of morbidity following pancreaticoduodenectomy. A predictive indicator would be highly advantageous. One potential marker is drain amylase concentration (DAC). However, its predictive value has not been fully established.405 patients undergoing pancreaticoduodenectomy at our centre over a 10 year period were reviewed to determine the value of DAC as a predictive indicator for the development of POPF.POPF developed in 58 patients (14%). These patients suffered greater morbidity. Overall 30-day mortality was 1.5%. Male gender (OR: 5.1; p = 0.0082) and age > 70 (OR 2; p = 0.0372) were independent risk factors for POPF, whilst Type 2 diabetes (OR: 0.2321; p = 0.0090) and pancreatic ductal-adenocarcinoma (OR: 0.3721; p = 0.0039) decreased POPF risk. The DACs post-operatively were significantly higher in those developing POPF, but with significant overlap. ROC curves revealed optimal threshold values for differentiating POPF and non-POPF patients. A DAC°<°1400 U/ml on day 1 and <768 U/ml on day 2, although having a poor positive predictive value (32-44%), had a very strong negative predictive value (97-99%).Our data suggest that post-operative DAC below the determined optimal threshold values on day 1 and 2 following pancreaticoduodenectomy carries high negative predictive value for POPF development and identifies patients in whom early drain removal, and enhanced recovery may be considered, with simultaneous assessment of operative and clinical factors.Indicators of complications and drain removal after pancreatoduodenectomy.Significance and timing of drain removal after pancreatic surgery remain unclear. The aim of this study was to identify optimal indicators to predict severe intra-abdominal complications and determine the appropriate timing of prophylactic drain removal after pancreatoduodenectomy.This study included 151 consecutive patients who underwent pancreatoduodenectomy. We investigated associations between postoperative intra-abdominal complications, drain amylase levels, and duration of postoperative inflammatory response.Patients who developed severe intra-abdominal complications showed re-elevation of drain amylase levels after postoperative d 3 and prolonged postoperative inflammatory response, which were most pronounced in patients with severe pancreatic fistula and intra-abdominal abscess, respectively. In contrast, patients with a steady decline in drain amylase levels and short-term postoperative inflammatory response did not develop severe complications, and safe drain removal was possible even when the drain amylase value was more than three times the upper limit of normal serum amylase.A combination of trends in the drain amylase level and duration of the inflammatory response in the postoperative period may be optimal indicators for early detection of severe intra-abdominal complications and appropriate timing of drain removal.Pancreatic juice output and amylase level in the drainage fluid after pancreatoduodenectomy in relation to leakage.The objective of this study was to clarify the relationship between the consistency of the pancreas and pancreatic anastomotic leakage after pancreatectomy.Sixty-two patients who underwent proximal pancreatectomy with pancreaticoenterostomy were reviewed with regard to the consistency of the pancreas, size of the main pancreatic duct, postoperative pancreatic juice output, and pancreatic leakage after partial pancreatoduodenectomy. The pancreatic parenchyma was classified as having soft, intermediate and hard consistency (group 1, 2 and 3, respectively). Monitoring the output of pancreatic juice and amylase level in the drainage fluid after operation for the purpose of detecting of dehiscence of pancreaticoenterostomy.The mean pancreatic juice output during a period of 10 days (postoperative days 5 to 14) was 2446 +/- 27 cc in group 1 (n = 26), 846 +/- 13.5 cc in group 2 (n = 19) and 460 +/- 8.1 cc in group 3 (n = 17). Anastomotic leakage occurred in four (15%) patients in group 1, three (15%) in group 2, and none in group 3. In patients with leakage, abrupt decrease or fluctuating output of pancreatic juice occurred and amylase level in the drainage fluid was more than 10,000 IU/L POD 7.Patients with a pancreatic parenchyma with an intermediate or normal consistency produced more pancreatic juice and had a higher leak rate. Monitoring the output of pancreatic juice and amylase level in the drainage fluid after operation may provide a clue to the detection of dehiscence of pancreaticoenterostomy.Postoperative drain amylase predicts pancreatic fistula in pancreatic surgery: A systematic review and meta-analysis.This study to evaluate the utility of drain fluid amylase as a predictor of PF in patients undergoing pancreatic surgery based on the International Study Group of Pancreatic Fistula definitions of pancreatic fistula.A comprehensive search was carried out using Pubmed (Medline), Embase, Web of science and Cochrane database for clinical trials, which studied DFA as a diagnostic marker for pancreatic fistula after pancreatic surgery. Sensitivity, specificity and the diagnostic odds ratios with 95% confidence interval were calculated for each study. Summary receiver-operating curves were conducted and the area under the curve was evaluated.A total of 10 studies were included. The pooled sensitivity and specificity of drain fluid amylase Day 1 for the diagnosis of postoperative pancreatic fistula were 81% and 87%, respectively (area under the curve was 0.897, diagnostic odds ratios was 16.83 and 95%CI was 12.66-22.36), the pooled sensitivity and specificity of drain fluid amylase Day 3 for the diagnosis of postoperative pancreatic fistula were 56% and 79%, respectively (area under the curve was 0.668, diagnostic odds ratios was 3.26 and 95%CI was 1.83-5.82) CONCLUSIONS: The drain fluid amylase Day 1, instead of drain fluid amylase Day 3, may be a useful criterion for the early identification of postoperative pancreatic fistula, and a value of drain fluid amylase Day 1 over than 1300 U/L was a risk factor of pancreatic fistula. And the diagnostic accuracy and the proposed cut-off levels of drain fluid amylase Day 1 in predicting the postoperative pancreatic fistula will have to be validated by multicenter prospective studies.Novel diagnostics for aggravating pancreatic fistulas at the acute phase after pancreatectomy.To identify sensitive predictors of clinically relevant postoperative pancreatic fistula (POPF) at the acute phase after pancreatectomy.This study included 153 patients diagnosed as having POPFs at postoperative day (POD) 3 after either open pancreatoduodenectomy or distal pancreatectomy between January 2008 and March 2013. The POPFs were categorized into three grades based on the International Study Group on Pancreatic Fistula Definition, and POPFs of grades B or C were considered to be clinically relevant. The predictive performance for the clinically relevant POPF formation of values at PODs 1, 3 and 5 as well as time-dependent changes in levels of inflammatory markers, including white blood cell count, neutrophil count, total lymphocyte count, C-reactive protein (CRP), procalcitonin level, platelet-to-lymphocyte ratio and neutrophil-to-lymphocyte ratio, and amylase content in the drain fluid were compared using the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve and multivariable analyses. A scoring system for the prediction of clinically relevant POPFs was created using five risk factors identified in this study, and its diagnostic performance was also evaluated.Over time, 77 (50%) of 153 enrolled patients followed a protracted course and were categorized as having clinically relevant POPFs. ROC curve analyses revealed that changes in CRP levels from POD 1 to POD 3 had the greatest area under the curve value (0.767) and that an elevated CRP level of 28.4 mg/L yielded the most optimal predictive value for clinically relevant POPFs. Multivariable analyses for the risk factors of clinically relevant POPFs identified invasive carcinomas of the pancreas and elevation of the CRP level (≥ 28.4 mg/L, from POD 1 to POD 3) as independent diagnostic factors for clinically relevant POPFs (OR 2.94, 95%CI: 1.08-8.55, P = 0.035 and OR 4.82, 95%CI: 1.25-20.2, P = 0.022, respectively). A gradual increase in the prevalence of clinically relevant POPFs in proportion to the risk classification score was confirmed. A highly elevated CRP level and a risk score ≥ 8 were significantly associated with a prolonged duration of drain placement and postoperative hospitalization.A steep rise in the serum CRP level from POD 1 to POD 3 was a highly predictive factor for subsequent clinically relevant POPFs.Multivariate logistic regression analysis for prediction of clinically relevant pancreatic fistula in the early phase after pancreaticoduodenectomy.Postoperative pancreatic fistula (PF) remains a major complication after pancreaticoduodenectomy (PD). We aimed to investigate the predictors of clinically relevant PF after PD.We retrospectively analyzed the predictive factors of relevant grade B/C PF using logistic regression analysis of 100 consecutive patients who underwent PD. PF was defined in accordance with the International Study Group on PF (ISGPF).White blood cell count (WBC) of 73.6 × 10(2) /μl, C-reactive protein (CRP) of 9.3 mg/dl and amylase value in drains (d-amylase) of 647 U/I on postoperative day (POD) 4 were proposed as the cut-off values for predicting grade B/C PF with high accuracy by the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve. Multivariate logistic regression analysis revealed that the three factors as significant predictive factors and the predicted probability of detecting grade B/C PF was calculated by the following formula; P = 1/[1 + exp{-(2.033 × WBC+3.269 × CRP+2.698 × d-amylase-4.122)}]. P > 0.5 indicates the prospective incidence of the PF. When the cut-off values of the three significant predictors were substituted into the formula, P always showed above 0.5 if more than two predictors were above their cut-off values, indicating a high probability of grade B/C PF.White blood cell count, CRP and d-amylase on POD4 were predictive factors for clinically relevant PF after PD. These findings indicate that our formula is useful for management of drain after PD.Can the measurement of amylase in drain after distal pancreatectomy predict post-operative pancreatic fistula?The most frequent reason for performing a distal pancreatectomy is the presence of cystic or neuroendocrine tumors, in which the distal pancreatic stump is often soft and non fibrotic. This parenchymal consistence represents the main risk factor for post-operative pancreatic fistula. In order to identify the fistula and assessing its severity postoperative monitoring of amylase from intraperitoneal drains is important.From a retrospective multicentric database analysis were included 33 patients who underwent distal pancreatectomy for pancreatic neoplastic disease.Postoperative pancreatic fistula occurred in four cases. One patient had a ductal adenocarcinoma, two presented with pancreatic endocrine neoplasms and the last one had an intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasia. Two patients underwent open, the other two laparoscopic distal pancreatectomy.Postoperative pancreatic fistulas after distal pancreatectomy worsen the quality of life, prolong the post-operative stay and delay further adjuvant therapy. In patients who underwent distal pancreatectomy literature exposed some advantages deriving from the placement of abdominal drainages only in selected cases and from their early removal. Patients presenting a high risk of pancreatic fistula had higher amylase levels of drainage fluid in the first postoperative day.POPF is the most frequently complication after pancreatectomy. In our analysis DFA1>5000 can be considered as a predictive factor for pancreatic fistula. For this reason, the systematic measurement of amylase in drain fluid in first-postoperative day can be considered a good clinical practice.Amylase level in drains after pancreatoduodenectomy as a predictor of clinically significant pancreatic fistula.Amylase level in drains (ALD) has been proposed as a predictor for the development of a clinically significant pancreatic fistula (CS-PF) in patients undergoing a major pancreatic surgery. This study aimed to determine if the ALD in patients who developed a CS-PF after pancreatoduodenectomy is higher than that for patients with transient fistulae and to establish a threshold value as a predictor of a CS-PF.From January 2002 to December 2012, all patients undergoing pancreatoduodenectomy were enrolled. At least 1 ALD measurement on postoperative day 3 was obtained. Pancreatic fistula (PF) was defined according to the International Study Group on Pancreatic Fistula. Both grade B and C PFs were considered as a CS-PF. We determined the cutoff value with a receiver operating characteristic curve.A total of 135 patients were enrolled. Pancreatic fistula was diagnosed in 36 cases (26.7%). The ALD median values were the following: PF grade A, 1809 U/L; PF grade B, 19,710 U/L; and PF grade C, 27,590 U/L. A drain amylase value of 2820 U/L was determined to be the cutoff for the development of a CS-PF.Patients with CS-PF have higher values of ALD than patients who developed a mild/transient fistula. An ALD higher than 2820 U/L identifies patients likely to present a CS-PF.Utility of drain fluid amylase measurement on the first postoperative day after pancreaticoduodenectomy.Early detection of pancreatic fistula (PF) may improve the outcome after pancreaticoduodenectomy, and exclusion of PF may allow earlier drain removal and accelerate recovery. The aim of the present study was to evaluate the relationship between drain fluid amylase on the first postoperative day (DFA(1)) and PF.This work was designed as a prospective study and included patients undergoing pancreaticoduodenectomy in a single center. For each patient, DFA was measured on the first and fifth postoperative days, and PF was defined by drainage of amylase-rich fluid on the fifth postoperative day (DFA(5) >300 U/l). A cut-off value of DFA(1) was derived, which yielded sensitivity and negative predictive value of 100% for predicting a PF.A total of 70 patients (47% male) who underwent pancreaticoduodenectomy (Whipple procedure: 37; pylorus-preserving procedure: 33) between April 2009 and March 2010 were included. Nine of those patients developed a PF (grade A-2; B-5; C-2). There were two postoperative deaths (3%). The DFA(1) value significantly correlated with DFA(5) (Spearman rank coefficient 0.68; p < 0.0001). The median DFA(1) of patients with a PF (6,205; range 357-23,391) was significantly higher than in patients without a PF (69; range 5-5,180; p = 0.01; unpaired t test). No patient with a PF had a DFA(1) ≤350 U/l, compared to 48/61 patients (79%) without a PF. Using 350 U/l as a cut-off, a low DFA(1) excluded a PF with a sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values of 100, 79, 41, and 100%, respectively.Drain fluid amylase on the DFA(1) after pancreaticoduodenectomy stratifies patients according to likelihood of developing a PF.Routine Drainage After Pancreaticoduodenectomy: Serum Amylase Can Guide Early, Selective Drain Removal.Pancreatic fistula after pancreatic head resection; incidence, significance and management.Anastomotic leak at the pancreatojejunostomy remains a common and dreaded complication after pancreaticoduodenectomy. Our aim was to determine the incidence, presentation, methods of management, and preoperative and postoperative factors that influence the clinical outcome.We reviewed our collective experience with 70 consecutive patients from 1985 to 2000 for a variety of pathologic indications. Clinical, biochemical, intraoperative and postoperative factors were reviewed in an attempt to determine prognostic factors.Nine patients (12%) developed a pancreatic anastomotic leak as determined by increased amylase in drainage fluid (70%), were clinically insignificant and were managed by simple maintenance of intraoperatively placed drains. Although octreotide was used therapeutically in 4 patients (44%), significant, objective response was noted in all patients. Of the clinical, biochemical, intraoperative and postoperative factors reviewed to determine prognostic factors, a large amount of postoperative pancreatic juice output (P = 0.02) was a significant risk factor for pancreatic fistula formation.We conclude that most anastomotic leak at pancreaticoenterostomy after pancreaticoduodenectomy can be managed conservatively. Use of octreotide to aid in closure of the pancreatic leak was satisfactory.Evaluation of a predictive model for pancreatic fistula based on amylase value in drains after pancreatic resection.Amylase value in drains (AVD) is a predictor of pancreatic fistula (PF). We evaluated the accuracy of an AVD-based model.Two hundred thirty-one patients underwent pancreatoduodenectomy with pancreaticojejunostomy (PDPJ) or pancreatoduodenectomy with duct-to-mucosa (PDDTM) and distal pancreatectomy (DP). Patients with AVD greater than 5,000 U/L on postoperative day (POD) 1 underwent AVD measurement on POD5.Sensitivity and specificity of POD1 AVD greater than 5,000 in predicting PF were 71% and 90%, respectively. The sensitivity and specificity of POD5 AVD greater than 200 were 90% and 83%, respectively. AVD greater than 1,000 (for PDPJ) and 2,000 U/L (PDDTM and DP) represented the most accurate cutoffs on POD1. AVD greater than 200 (PDPJ), 300 (PDDTM), and 50 U/L (DP) represented the cutoffs with the highest sensitivity in predicting PF on POD5.AVD-based model for predicting PF after pancreatic resection is an accurate tool, although AVD cutoffs should be evaluated for each type of operation.Usefulness of drain amylase, serum C-reactive protein levels and body temperature to predict postoperative pancreatic fistula after pancreaticoduodenectomy.Postoperative pancreatic fistula (POPF) after pancreaticoduodenectomy (PD) is a worrisome and life-threatening complication. Recently, early drain removal has been recommended as a means of preventing POPF. The present study sought to determine how to distinguish clinical POPF from non-clinical POPF in the early postoperative period after PD to aid in early drain removal.From March 2002 through December 2010, 176 patients underwent PD and were enrolled in this study to examine factors predictive of clinical POPF after PD. POPF was defined and classified according to the International Study Group of Pancreatic Surgery guideline, and grade B/C POPF was defined as clinical POPF.Grade A POPF occurred in 39 (22.2 %) patients, grade B in 19 (10.8 %) patients, and grade C in 11 (6.3 %) patients. Clinical POPF (grade B/C) occurred in 17.1 % of patients. Multivariate analysis revealed male gender and body mass index (BMI) ≥22.5 kg/m(2) to be the independent preoperative risk factors predictive of POPF. Receiver operating characteristic curves showed that the combination of drain amylase ≥750 IU/L, C-reactive protein (CRP) ≥20 mg/dL, and body temperature ≥37.5 °C on postoperative day 3 could effectively distinguish clinical POPF from non-clinical POPF. Sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy were 84.6, 98.2, and 95.7 %, respectively.Male gender and BMI ≥22.5 were the independent preoperative predictive risk factors for POPF. We assume that when amylase is <750 IU/L, serum CRP is <20 mg/dL, and body temperature is <37.5 °C the drain can safely be removed, even if POPF is indicated.Amylase value in drains after pancreatic resection as predictive factor of postoperative pancreatic fistula: results of a prospective study in 137 patients.The correlation of the amylase value in drains (AVD) with the development of pancreatic fistula (PF) is still unclear.The purpose of this study was to identify within the first postoperative day (POD1) the predictive role of different risks factors, including AVD, in the development of PF.We prospectively investigated 137 patients who underwent major pancreatic resections. PF was defined and graded in accordance with the International Study Group on PF.We considered 101 pancreaticoduodenectomies and 36 distal resections. The overall incidence of PF (A, B, and C grades) was 19.7% and it was 14.8% after pancreaticoduodenectomy and 33.3% after distal resection. All PF occurred in "soft" remnant pancreas. The PF developed in patients with a POD1 median AVD of 10,000 U/L, whereas patients without PF had a median AVD of 1222 U/L (P < 0.001). We established a cut-off of 5000 U/L POD1 AVD for univariate and multivariate analysis. The area under the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve was 0.922 (P < 0.001). The predicting risk factors selected in the univariate setting were "soft" pancreas (P = 0.005; odds ratio [OR]: 1.54; 95% CI: 1.32-1.79) and AVD (P < 0.001; OR: 5.66; 95% CI: 3.6-8.7; positive predictive value 59%; negative predictive value 98%), whereas in multivariate analysis the predicting risk factor was the POD1 AVD (P < 0.001; OR: 68.4; 95% CI: 14.8-315). Only 2 PFs were detected with AVD <5000 U/L and both were in pancreatogastric anastomosis (P = 0.053).AVD in POD1 > or =5000 U/L is the only significant predictive factor of PF development.Does postoperative drain amylase predict pancreatic fistula after pancreatectomy?Previous studies suggest that after pancreatectomy, drain fluid amylase obtained on postoperative day 1 (DFA1) >5,000 U/L correlates with the development of postoperative pancreatic fistula (PF).(1,2) We sought to validate whether DFA1 is a clinically useful predictor of PF and to evaluate whether DFA1 correlates with PF severity.Using a prospective database, we reviewed records from patients having pancreatectomy between 2010 and 2012. Presence and grade of PF were determined using the consensus guidelines from the International Study Group on Pancreatic Fistula (ISGPF).(1) RESULTS: Sixty-three patients who underwent pancreatectomy had a documented DFA1. There were 27 (43%) who developed PF: 2 (7%) were grade A, 18 grade B (67%), and 7 were grade C (26%). Median DFA1 in patients with PF (4,600 U/L, range 32 to 16,900 U/L) was significantly higher than in those without PF (45 U/L, range 2 to 5,840 U/L; p < 0.001). When DFA1 was analyzed at varying cutoff values, correlation of DFA1 with PF was high. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), and negative predictive value (NPV) were assessed at varying levels of DFA1. Highest sensitivity (96%) and NPV (96%) were obtained with a cutoff DFA1 of <100 U/L. On multivariate analysis, DFA1 >100 U/L was the only significant predictor of PF when controlling for gland texture, duct size, pathology, and neoadjuvant radiation. There was no statistically significant relationship between DFA1 and PF grade.In patients undergoing pancreatic resection, a cutoff DFA1 of 100 U/L resulted in high sensitivity and NPV. Early drain removal may be safe in these patients. Further studies are recommended to validate the role of DFA1 in excluding PF and assisting in management of surgical drains.Drain Management after Pancreatoduodenectomy: Reappraisal of a Prospective Randomized Trial Using Risk Stratification.A recent randomized trial used the Fistula Risk Score (FRS) to develop guidelines for selective drainage based on clinically relevant fistula (CR-POPF) risk. Additionally, postoperative day (POD) 1 drain and serum amylase have been identified as accurate postoperative predictors of CR-POPF. This study sought to identify patients who may benefit from selective drainage, as well as the optimal timing for drain removal after pancreatoduodenectomy.One hundred six pancreatoduodenectomies from a previously reported RCT were assessed using risk-adjustment. The incidence of CR-POPF was compared between FRS risk cohorts. Drain and serum amylase values from POD 1 were evaluated using receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis to establish cut-offs predictive of CR-POPF occurrence. A regression analysis compared drain removal randomizations (POD 3 vs POD 5).Three-quarters of patients had moderate/high CR-POPF risk. This group had a CR-POPF rate of 36.3% vs 7.7% among negligible/low risk patients (p = 0.005). The areas under the ROC curve for CR-POPF prediction using POD 1 drain and serum amylase values were 0.800 (p = 0.000001; 95% CI 0.70-0.90) and 0.655 (p = 0.012; 95% CI 0.55-0.77), respectively. No significant serum amylase cut-offs were identified. Moderate/high risk patients with POD 1 drain amylase ≤ 5,000 U/L had significantly lower rates of CR-POPF when randomized to POD 3 drain removal (4.2% vs 38.5%; p = 0.003); moreover, these patients experienced fewer complications and shorter hospital stays.A clinical care protocol is proposed whereby drains are recommended for moderate/high FRS risk patients, but may be omitted in patients with negligible/low risk. Drain amylase values in moderate/high risk patients should then be evaluated on POD 1 to determine the optimal timing for drain removal. Moderate/high risk patients with POD 1 drain amylase ≤ 5,000 U/L have lower rates of CR-POPF with POD 3 (vs POD ≥ 5) drain removal; early drain removal is recommended for these patients.Predictive risk factors for clinically relevant pancreatic fistula analyzed in 1,239 patients with pancreaticoduodenectomy: multicenter data collection as a project study of pancreatic surgery by the Japanese Society of Hepato-Biliary-Pancreatic Surgery.It is important to predict the development of clinically relevant pancreatic fistula (grade B/C) in the early period after pancreaticoduodenectomy (PD). This study has been carried out as a project study of the Japanese Society of Hepato-Biliary-Pancreatic Surgery (JSHPBS) to evaluate the predictive factors associated with clinically relevant pancreatic fistula (grade B/C).The data of 1,239 patients from 11 medical institutions who had undergone PD between July 2005 and June 2009 were retrospectively analyzed to review patient characteristics and perioperative and postoperative parameters.A drain amylase level >4,000 IU/L on postoperative day (POD) 1 was proposed as the cut-off level to predict clinical relevant pancreatic fistula by the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve. The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of this cut-off level were 62.2, 89.0, and 84.8%, respectively. A multivariate logistic regression analysis revealed that male [odds ratio (OR) 1.7, P = 0.039], intraoperative bleeding >1,000 ml (OR 2.5, P = 0.001), soft pancreas (OR 2.7, P = 0.001), and drain amylase level on POD 1 >4,000 IU/L (OR 8.6, P < 0.001) were the significant predictive factors for clinical pancreatic fistula.The four predictive risk factors identified here can provide useful information useful for tailoring postoperative management of clinically relevant pancreatic fistula (grade B/C).Schematic pancreatic configuration: a risk assessment for postoperative pancreatic fistula after pancreaticoduodenectomy.Postoperative pancreatic fistula (POPF) remains a serious complication after pancreaticoduodenectomy (PD). Preoperative risk assessment of POPF is desirable in careful preparation for operation. The aim of this study was to assess simple and accurate risk factors for clinically relevant POPF based on a schematic understanding of the pancreatic configuration using preoperative multidetector computed tomography.Three hundred and eighteen consecutive patients who underwent PD in the National Cancer Center Hospital East between November 2006 and March 2013 were investigated. Pre-, intra-, and postoperative clinicopathological findings as well as pancreatic configuration data were analyzed for the risk of clinically relevant POPF. POPF was defined according to the International Study Group of Pancreatic Fistula classification. POPF grade A occurred in 52 patients (16.4%), grade B in 84 (26.4%), and grade C in 6 (1.9%).Independent risk factors for POPF grade B/C included main pancreatic duct diameter (MPDd) < 2 mm (P = 0.001), parenchymal thickness ≥ 8 mm (P = 0.018), not performing portal vein/superior mesenteric vein resection (P = 0.004), and amylase level of drainage fluid on postoperative day 3 ≥ 375 IU/L (P < 0.001). Pancreatic configuration data including MPDd and parenchymal thickness were good indicators of clinically relevant POPF.Low drain fluid amylase predicts absence of pancreatic fistula following pancreatectomy.Improvements in the ability to predict pancreatic fistula could enhance patient outcomes. Previous studies demonstrate that drain fluid amylase on postoperative day 1 (DFA1) is predictive of pancreatic fistula. We sought to assess the accuracy of DFA1 and to identify a reliable DFA1 threshold under which pancreatic fistula is ruled out.Patients undergoing pancreatic resection from November 1, 2011 to December 31, 2012 were selected from the American College of Surgeons-National Surgical Quality Improvement Program Pancreatectomy Demonstration Project database. Pancreatic fistula was defined as drainage of amylase-rich fluid with drain continuation >7 days, percutaneous drainage, or reoperation for a pancreatic fluid collection. Univariate and multi-variable regression models were utilized to identify factors predictive of pancreatic fistula.DFA1 was recorded in 536 of 2,805 patients who underwent pancreatic resection, including pancreaticoduodenectomy (n = 380), distal pancreatectomy (n = 140), and enucleation (n = 16). Pancreatic fistula occurred in 92/536 (17.2%) patients. DFA1, increased body mass index, small pancreatic duct size, and soft texture were associated with fistula (p < 0.05). A DFA1 cutoff value of <90 U/L demonstrated the highest negative predictive value of 98.2%. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve confirmed the predictive relationship of DFA1 and pancreatic fistula.Low DFA1 predicts the absence of a pancreatic fistula. In patients with DFA1 < 90 U/L, early drain removal is advisable.Diagnostic value of abdominal drainage in individual risk assessment of pancreatic fistula following pancreaticoduodenectomy.The use of prophylactic abdominal drainage following pancreaticoduodenectomy (PD) is controversial as its therapeutic value is uncertain. However, the diagnosis of postoperative pancreatic fistula (POPF), the main cause of PD-associated morbidity, is often based on drain pancreatic amylase (DPA) levels. The aim of this study was to assess the predictive value of DPA, plasma pancreatic amylase (PPA) and serum C-reactive protein (CRP) for diagnosing POPF after PD.Patients undergoing PD with prophylactic drainage between 2008 and 2012 were studied prospectively. DPA, PPA and CRP levels were obtained daily. Differences between groups with clinically relevant POPF (International Study Group on Pancreatic Fistula (ISGPF) grade B/C) and without clinically relevant POPF (no POPF or ISGPF grade A) were evaluated. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analyses were performed to determine the value of DPA, PPA and CRP in prediction of POPF. Risk profiles for clinically relevant POPF were constructed and related to the intraoperative pancreatic risk assessment.Fifty-nine (18.7 per cent) of 315 patients developed clinically relevant POPF. DPA, PPA and CRP levels on postoperative day (POD) 1-3 differed significantly between the study groups. In predicting POPF, the DPA level on POD 1 (cut-off at 1322 units/l; odds ratio (OR) 24.61, 95 per cent confidence interval 11.55 to 52.42) and POD 2 (cut-off at 314 units/l; OR 35.45, 14.07 to 89.33) was superior to that of PPA on POD 1 (cut-off at 177 units/l; OR 13.67, 6.46 to 28.94) and POD 2 (cut-off at 98 units/l; OR 16.97, 8.33 to 34.59). When DPA was combined with CRP (cut-off on POD 3 at 202 mg/l; OR 16.98, 8.43 to 34.21), 90.3 per cent of postoperative courses could be predicted correctly (OR 44.14, 16.89 to 115.38).The combination of serum CRP and DPA adequately predicted the development of clinically relevant pancreatic fistula following PD.